I finished all my Valentine's chocolates.
I must mention the smoking first. Holy cow! Everyone smokes. All the time. Even the women. I find this interesting because my mother NEVER smoked in public, and she wasn’t what I’d call a “real” smoker. In fact, I’ve seen very few people who smoked the way she did. My father hated smoking (probably because it was her vice and not his) so she didn’t smoke until he went to work. Isn’t that so mid-century? He worked the night shift and she smoked one cigarette after he left the house. That was it. He knew she smoked. She just didn’t do it around him because he didn’t like it.
Well. I don't really have a clue where to start. What an excellent and epic story! I surpose the best compliment I can pay The War Games is that I don't know what or how to write about it. The real genius of this story is it's cleverly multi-layered plot. One can't ignore the massive revelations and their repercussions and also the truly excellent cameo and guest appearances. At ten episodes The War Games feels truly epic, but in a good way unlike say The Dalek's Master Plan. The story was lengthened to ten episodes when a planned story called The Impersonators was cancelled. Many label The War Games as over-long, but I believe that unlike other stories that were lengthened or replacements due to planned story's cancellations, like The Invasion or The Krotons, at ten episodes The War Games works. It doesn't get ponderous and tangential, it thunders along nicely. I am aware that there is much of note in this epic story but I promise I will try to make brevity my boon companion throughout.
onto you
Upgrades, people, upgrades. That’s how we make the dough. Now if we’re telling robots that no matter what they’re made of they’re “fine”, how can we expect them to feel crummy enough about themselves to buy our upgrades and make themselves look better? Therefore, I’ve come up with a new slogan: “Why be you, when you can be new?”
I was in 8th grade, and I wanted to be Columbia, my favorite RHPS character, on Halloween. However, the hot pants and sequined strapless top from her opening scene were not really appropriate for parading down the hallways of my pod, so I chose Columbia's slightly more demure PJ look.
The Militia movement has always has a presence in South Carolina. It is to be expected, we have a pro gun culture, we hold a hyper authoritarian view on society, we do not like the federal government and we are, as a state and individually, on the whole under-educated. Fertile ground for conspiracy theories that fuel these movements
Cravings: Not much....just hungrier than ever!!!!
Starbucks had happy hour this last week. From 3-5pm, all their frapps were half off! I've been doing really good about not buying coffees since I got my Keurig, but I had to take advantage of that great deal!
Fortunately it didn’t taste like a tire. And unlike Katy Perry’s hit song “I Kissed a Girl (and I Liked It)” it didn’t taste like cherry chapstick either.
I am having one of those days where I want to eat something but don’t fancy anything. On days like these, I end up mass-producing food in hope that I’d want to eat some by the time I’m done.
It’s an interesting and keenly observant article. However, the conclusion alluded to in the title is misguided. The writer portrays the Hipster movement as if it is the most recent heir in a rich tradition of countercultures which ends the line of succession by absorbing the mainstream, rather than rejecting it, and eventually exploding… or maybe imploding. I’m not sure. The “exploding/imploding” metaphor is mine, not his. Regardless, he says the movement ends, taking Western civilization with it.
A — The reason the Republicans offer bigger tax cuts for the wealthy, is:
Marketing is Meera’s domain, and with around 7,000 people on the nilgiri’s mailing list her job is quite a ‘cakewalk’, or so we all think! There’s always more to it than meets the eye and at the end of the day we need bu*s on seats and Meera generally delivers!!
So, soar like an eagle
This award comes with a list of questions:
Malcome 11-61, long 12 TD
I usually plan on serving them with some homemade Spanish rice and refried beans, but my hubby has insisted that the enchiladas will be enough -- if I were to serve anything else with them, it means he won't be able to eat as many enchiladas. Silly boy.
Competitive Intelligence and Provisional Rights; Defensive Publication Strategies, CPS Roundtable Discussion led by
I get really touchy feely. I also do this eye lock/bottom lip bite.
Have I told you yet how much I love baking bread? That my idea of a perfect morning is mixing up yeast, flour and water, taking a nice long walk, then coming back to find what was once a little ball of dough doubled in size? There is something magical about baking homemade bread. And so, last week, when these Chicken Gyros were on the menu, it was the perfect opportunity to try my hand at homemade pita bread. Here’s how it’s done.
Nine years later, Mia is a precocious sixteen-year-old and her life is changing all around, all she wants is her mother. Through the tapes, Jenna’s voice returns to teach Mia the magic of life, her words showing her daughter how to spread her wings and embrace the coming challenges with humor, grace and hope.
In my opinion, regardless of Calvin’s intention or motive, his classification of the issue of women’s silence in church as indifferent to salvation does have positive implications for women in ministry. He may not have meant to give the kind of freedom Douglass hopes for in her analysis of his humanist background and theological writings, but he did open the door for it.
Over time I actually met Mel a few times. He seemed like a pleasant, personable man. I could see no reason why he and Kathy would not make a fine married couple, but what do I know?
Each one of you are such a big part of my life now. A celebration would not be complete without you all in it with me.
Okay, now on to today's card...
5. The Girl I Left Behind Me
Sonic Blitz Adventitious bliss off with Sonic and Tales accepting sucked through some affectionate of dimensional aperture and catastrophe up on a babyish island inhabited by a adolescent raccoon alleged Marine. It would accept that Marine is the blazon of appearance that’s declared to be the assistant relief. In practice, she ends up annoying on the fretfulness with her coy obliviousness, authoritative you appetite to skip adapted accomplished the game’s babble sequences. Luckily, you won’t absence abundant if you do. As Sonic, Tails, and the added intolerable Marine try to bulk out a way to get Sonic and Tails aback to their dimension, you eventually angle up with Blaze the Cat, the added playable appearance from the aboriginal Sonic Rush, and go afterwards one Captain Whisker, a agilely inept apprentice charlatan in ascendancy of an age-old antiquity that Blaze is aggravating to recover.
Keith Maskell
So that’s the big word of the day: Integrity. I thought that along with all this buzzy-new current of Sweet Awareness happening, I ought to give a bit of attention to the Integrity we carry with us, and how important it is.
But beware, some of these items are probably more proper for a "dream-on" list and should be reserved for someone incredibly special unless you have bottomless pockets or the unique love language for this sort of thing. Most of it is fair game, though!
812320 Drycleaning & laundry services (except coin-operated) (including laundry & drycleaning drop off & pickup sites)
by joyous occasion,
1 cup of baking soda
Before I toss those old mss. into the flames, there is one other consideration: Some of this earlier work is pretty good, and I would like to see it out there again.
Scarperia, 3 May – A further 500 kilometres for the F2012, which reached the 250 lap threshold, equivalent to over 1300 kilometres during the course of the past three days at the Mugello Circuit. After rain on Tuesday came the second difficulty of the test, in the form of an off-track excursion for Fernando Alonso around mid morning. He went off at Turn 12, doing some damage to the front left corner of the car and the front wing, but more significantly, the incident cost two and a half hours of track time. “First of all, I want to put everyone’s mind at rest, my family and friends: I’m fine, no harm done after hitting the crash barrier at seven kilometres an hour,” said the Spaniard with a touch of irony, when he met with the journalists at the end of the day. “We made up for the time lost this morning in the afternoon in terms of quantity, given that the final mileage is more or less what we had planned for, but not in terms of quality, because the track had changed this afternoon, mainly because of the wind.
The Gua Langsir cave is a limestone formation on a hillock of the island. Located at an altitude of 91 m from sea level, tourists need to beware the thousands of bats that inhabit the dark interiors of the cave. Cave explorers alight at the island’s jetty on the western shoreline of the island and trek their way up the hilly track. It is always advisable to visit the cave well equipped with mountaineering tools and other such paraphernalia.
copics only. You are welcome to use any coloring medium to complete your
The dress of Ann Curtis and Jerico Rosales were donated by the producer to the town’s Museum along with the awards the movie “Baler” won.
And in the meantime, it looks like I’ll have to develop a similar relationship with Pinterest. The question is — will pinterest become my ‘pictures from high school’ depository or will it be something more?
So much for the old “All scientists agree” and “total scientific consensus”.
The club is having dinner, not right here, but close enough that I would normally go, but I don't think that I will go. There's the whole watching what I eat thing, and I can't sit in front of bowls of chips and salsa and not eat them. It will only be six weeks or so before my husband is back to asking me out for ice cream (if he even makes it that long), and I'm really trying to do nothing of that sort until then. So I won't be going out Sunday, and I even have to decide what to do about the next Saturday. Of course, I will go out then, but then I have to wonder if I'll eat anything or get a soda or what. To go out and buy nothing is rude, to go out and buy things I shouldn't eat is bad, and going out and then special ordering something like broccoli seems a waste.
Like many collectors, I have always enjoyed these Upper Deck Masterpeices and Chronology cards. They look great and you've got to love the on-card auto's. This is a nice addition to my PC and will make the Yankees games that much more fun for me. Happy collecting and… "Enjoy Every Crack of the Bat".
11. Blue Dye
We had some great down time.
I’m not sure if I’ve mentioned Snyder’s men before, but I’d really like to highlight them here. They all seem so full of love, but at the same time they are completely driven. They have an end point they’re working to and they never deviate from that. In no small way, they equal the badassery of the leading lady in each series and Riley is no exception. He’s completely brilliant in both Inside Out and Outside In. The way he pushes Trella to care for the people of Inside in this story is inspiring. In some ways, Riley is the unsung hero of this story. Even when Trella had given up or was injured and lying in bed, he still tirelessly worked to put their world right again. The world (both fictional and real) needs more Rileys.
So here's the plan. I am going to do the 30 day shred everyday during Tarynn's nap, and continue my efforts at the gym and excersising outside weather permitting. I go to Cal Fit a few times a week and do spin, group strength training, cardio machines, or weights.
Wait, where was I?
A departure from the old McRickson style, most tracks on the album have their basis in progressive keyboards & synthesized sounds with the propulsion provided by the guitar & vocals fashioned after the stylings of 1920s crooners, in particular 20s crooning sensation Russ Columbo, whose life was cut tragically short in the apex of his career in a freak antique dueling pistol accident.
Run, little white hare. Run and run, and no one will catch you.
Another equally likely route to sharing “back office functions” – which could be just as damaging to the building of political alliances against Coalition cuts - is merger of public service agencies within a locality (a la Total Place) of which today’s news from Blackburn of the merger of senior management of health and local government is a recent example.
let's see. I've been DMing mostly, and the rules have changed a lot over the past few days. Probably the funniest thing was guest starring as a librarian in a playtest game at DDXP. Also, I got to test the DR rules when the players had to cut open a dead wererat's stomach to find a gem it had swallowed. That was
Also sliding from favor are carpeted floors and vinyl and ceramic flooring (hardwood has become more desirable) and “upscale kitchen finishes” as granite countertops gradually give way to low-maintenance, more durable laminate countertops.
The animals ate the pineapple most likely because they were
Caleb
I want one in every color! I might even wear two to a finger if I were feeling crazy. Ever since subscribing to Lisa Eldridge on YouTube, I am obsessed with finding rings like hers (albeit less expensive). I found two sources, Robindira Unsworth, who makes all of the horizontal rings, and Pradman, who does the vertical ones. These are all sterling with gold vermeil and precious/semi-precious jewels. I think Lisa's are probably solid gold. A girl's gotta start somewhere!
A Season for Miracles ... Hallmark Channel ... 10 PM
“Steve’s a really good engineer” says Ryan. “He’s very quick, and on the first day he asked, “How do you want to do this?” and we told him we want to do it all live, no overdubs just guitar, bass, drums, and then on ‘Chi-Town’ I was putting a piano down at the end of the song and he said ‘Just so you know, if you put this down the album isn’t going to be all live. I don’t have a problem with doing it but you might have a problem with doing it because you told me you wanted a live record’. So you think about these things. And he doesn’t give any opinion on the music, he records without prejudice, he just records what you do, and for me that’s perfect.”
ORG/CONTACT PERSON: Sendong Relief Operations/Reynald Reyes (09167262483)
in you,
– When an associate or manager is helping you, on the sales floor or as they are completing your sale at the register, look them in the eye and listen. They need your full attention to make sure they are properly meeting your needs – and the many demands from senior management. If you’re talking on your phone or texting, you’re selfishly slowing business down for everyone else.
“It is particularly significant that a conservative woman was nominated for the nation’s second highest office,” she said. ”For years the feminist movement has acknowledged for leadership only those women who embrace a radical agenda. How refreshing that now we have a woman who reflects the values of mainstream American women. Sarah Palin is pro-life, pro- marriage and pro-family. She is a woman who is balancing the personal and professional in admirable ways. She is an outstanding woman who will be an excellent role model for the nation’s young people. Sarah Palin is chief among equals with American professional women; she brings the kind of balance that characterizes the high-achieving women of today. She will bring to the forefront of our cultural conversations an intelligent, realistic, well-grounded woman’s perspective.”
In a novel of this length, if there are six different characters who can’t help but proclaim the ugliness of Jane, we can only imagine how very ugly she must be. In real life, no one goes around telling ugly people they are not the prettiest people around. Since the novel is in Jane’s voice, these critical people are speaking to her face or within earshot that she needs a new face and a new body. How many times have you told someone you are not related to they were ugly? We uglies know we are ugly because no one’s ever told us we look good.
That's a 75% discount off of EACH lamp base! And to think that I was planning on paying full price for both of them when they first came out. MAN-OH-MAN am I glad I waited!
Just before we left to come back home this morning, after our eighth visit, I grabbed the visitor's book to make an entry. I had a flick through and rather embarrassingly I found that most of the entries were ours. Feeling self-conscious about leaving yet another comment about our children's latest milestones, this time I got Betty to draw a picture of a fairy.
Sam Adams Mighty Oak Ale
`--so long as I get SOMEWHERE,' Alice added as an explanation.
Libby claims Hugo to be an old friend. Dr. Brooks apologizes, explaining she wandered off.
FH: And getting things ready. Getting the envelopes all ready, with the address labels - it’s like a production line...and then I let the TIC know...
Oodah poodah, Solo?
So I read a quote on Groupie today “Marry someone who can do things you can’t, but cannot do things you can.”
Now comes the fun part! I had a lot of anxiety about making brown butter. I'd read about how great brown butter is...about how it has a rich, nutty quality that enhances the flavor of your dish. Everything from asparagus to chocolate chip cookies is now being made with it. Could I do it?
Safeway Driving School will be holding classes here at Vermilion High School beginning on April 9th. Please call 323-7700 to register.
The flight to Bettles was short and uneventful. I have to tell you that water landing is great, very soft. The best airplane landing I’ve ever experienced.
Smith, John C. (1987). Mystery cat on the loose in Wales. Daily Exclusive (London), 4 February: 23.
“‘Look’, he said. ‘It will be better if we both talk about the same subject at the same time. This isn’t a Chekov play’.”
Day 1: The easiest way to save money is to not have a car. I am not talking about the cost of gas, insurance, depreciation… No, I am impressed at how easy it is to retrench financially without having a car to go to big box retailers and spending money on cheap products. For example, on Day 1 I saved $20 not going to a movie and getting popcorn. (On Day 3 I saved $15 by not going to breakfast with the neighbor.) Buying big and heavy stuff is just not possible with bike transport or walking. We used to say that leaving the house on a weekend costs $200-no mas.
She knew I’d be really upset so she tried to compensate my loss with a new pet- one that doesn’t make much noise- a chinchilla :O
I opened the pages;
Some paragraphs make Islam and Islamic rule sound so wonderful- the “Golden Age” of Islam, the flowering of the arts and sciences….you almost want to go find a mosque and sign up!
Each time an election of some form or another comes around I’m always reminded of Colossians 1v15-17 . Colossians 1 might just be about my favourite chapter in Scripture, so I tend to find a link in it to everything.
Melissa of Iamnotshe has passed on YET ANOTHER AWARD! I feel very lucky that Melissa likes me! If we met in the playground I would run up to her and ask to be her friend!
The Mami Doodles website will shut its doors tomorrow. It was an amazing ride and I learned a lot. I also got to know wonderful people - that's probably the best part of it.
and I'm tardy....
445220 Fish & seafood markets
The gay rights movement better pray that the Supreme Court takes the Prop 8 case and that they uphold Prop 8…because if they don’t, you will see a federal Constitutional Amendment defining marriage as a man and a woman clear both the House and the Senate without much debate and you will see it ratified by three-quarters of the states. If California is willing to pass such a ban, do you really think any of the other states will put up much of a fight? And it will take generations to get that stain of an amendment overturned.
Our loves are not given, but only lent,
And ta-da; you have “put a bird on it”!
TG: Mom.
some of the drawings that were put up for sale, man was I haggard back then lol.
Alexander Hamilton wrote Federalist Paper 63. This paper directly refers to the Electoral College. Our founding fathers feared that those who ran for office could dupe the American people into voting for them. These men wanted to insure that the most qualified person was elected president. The Electoral College acted as check to so that the American people couldn’t be fooled.
Doug: Cut to Banner's boarding house, where April Sommers is watching all of this transpire on the news. We see a shadowy figure outside of her OPEN DOOR (duh), but he scoots away when she investigates a noise in the hallway. She assumed it was going to be Banner, and as we saw last ish, he's been a mystery-man and she wants some answers.
A Conversation with Vashti, Class of 2012
level. The classical notions of space, time, and
The worst part of it was, about an hour in, I realised I’d seen the damn film before, but it’d made all the impression that a seagull would have made, if said seagull was stuffed, mounted, buried forty feet below ground and never spoken of again, and you moved into that house three years later and found a leftover whiteboard with ‘seagull?’ written on it in dry-erase marker.
“And the disciples came, and said unto him, Why speakest thou unto them in parables? He answered and said unto them, Because it is given unto you to know the mysteries of the kingdom of heaven, but to them it is not given. Therefore speak I to them in parables; because they seeing see not; and hearing they hear not, neither do they understand.”
The New Years Eve parties that my Grandparents had at 399 East 4th were something else. For what seemed like days they would both prepare the food for the party. Turkey, ham, roast beef, cole slow, potato salad, black beans and white rice, fried bananas, along with many traditional dishes from Spain too complicated to mention.
The shadows broke and the soul awoke
If you have a mixer, add the atta and the baking powder and salt and spin to mix. Or dry mix the 3 ingredients.
After the High Speed train from St Pancras, arriving at Wye is like stepping back in time. It’s a great little country station: the buildings, constructed by the South Eastern Railway, date from 1846 and remain largely as built; the level-crossing keeper still uses a set of levers just off the platform to operate the gates. The village itself, to the east, is historic and picturesque, and includes the mediaeval buildings of Wye College, until recently an important place of study and research for Agriculture and Plant Sciences, but now, sadly, closed.
I think my most optimistic time — if all conditions are right — is probably a 4:20 finish based on the plan above, but I’m really just hoping for a 4:30 or better. Of course, I will still be very happy with a PR which is anything under 5:00. I’m pretty confident that it would take some severe weather or something very unexpected to interfere with a sub-5:00 finish.
Big Boy, Inbetween and Spunky all hold a special place in my heart. The emotions experienced during these past months would be too numerous to even start to mention. The memories will be everlasting in my mind. Closing my eyes I will always be able to see them circling above me higher and higher up into the clouds. Because of this experience there has been the reward of new friends as we all bonded together as Eaglet Momsters. I am certain that these friendships
Typically when I have to fertilize I lift this huge bag and try not to make a mess everywhere, with piles of fertilizer where I'm trying to pour it into the spreader. And then, since the yard is so large, I have to do that numerous times. Ugh, what a pain in the toosh! Thankfully the Snap Pac connects directly to the Snap Spreader! Hooray for no waste and less work for me! And, if I have any left over, it seals automatically when it's removed!
PS. There’s a great article in the New York Times about this show and feminine sexuality. You should read it here. It’s great food for thought.
Bush said that medical tourism was a growing business and Cayman has the right environment for the Shetty project.
FH: The committee of nine people - two from the bookshops (Waterstones and Bookland) and the rest from interested parties e.g. representatives from the Friends of the Chester Literature Festival, Chester Poets and Chester Writers - and there are subcommittees too which meet when I need them to meet.
-Upload your project using the above sketch to this post ONLY in the comment section by May 31st.
Jeans: Vigoss, via my best friend
Paint
Unlike most SUDEP cases, Traci’s death did not occur at home. She had been working for a few weeks at an island resort which required her to live in residence for up to ten days at a time. She found the work, dining room service and housekeeping, to be tiring but rewarding. She was pleased to have found a job that was within her physical capability, and to have a room all of her own, looking over the water, to write and draw in.
national geographic 1972
I can not control my racing thoughts, the craziness that seems to not only follow me, but actually embraces me and threatens to strangle me in its hold.
If you are bride reading this I want to hear from you. What do you want from a wedding blog? I have my own ideas but to make it work I need your feedback. Think style with substance and ask me anything!
The most interesting part of all to me has been my response. I have had the full range of sometimes intense emotions; however, I have taken it all in stride and not let the emotions of any one moment get set into a more lasting mood problem. I have somehow stayed grounded in my center and just let it be. I am actually letting my life unfold and maintaining a sort of curious detachment. The word that best describes it for me is transcendence. It feels good. I like it; and, I hope I can hold on to it.
Taetiseo will reveal their first performance for “Twinkle” on May 3rd through Mnet‘s ‘M!Countdown‘.
I have tried the Boston Lager, Irish Red, and Black Lager in the past. The Dunkelweizen was released last year and is only available in this 12 pack. The Octoberfest is a fall seasonal available as a stand-alone 6 pack.
Geddy Lee – Gary Weinraub
1 avail
* Read the book
Dressed in black trousers, a blazer and a cream silk shirt, Angelina looked effortlessly chic.
push to make room for.”
twas great to see you, hope you're in good shape
Now, I’m back at the hotel and it’s 12:00am Chicago time. United just called and said that my suitcase had arrived and they’d send it over within the next 3 hours. Ugh. I just want a shower and sleep, but I can’t take a shower and put my dirty ole clothes back on. Guess I’ll be staying up, waiting for my bag…
I attached the fence to the baseboard with screws, and used a handplane to finish the bevel.
Harp seal babies are covered in a downy, snowy white fur and were thus traditional targets for the fur industry, valued for their fluffy white pelts.
The wool flag is approximately 48 inches by 52 inches. Macon Arsenal flags are distinctive because the white Cross of St. Andrew extends through the center, isolating the banner’s center star.
I’m in an @work state of mind…
I LOVE all the papers in this gorgeous glitter paper pad called A Walk in the Garden. For this card, the scene was set, so all I had to do was pop in the image and the butterflies! Not every paper has a scene, but there are several and the coordinating papers are so pretty!!!
1) Nicole
Where all are different and one, A knows the liquid refraction in B through every kinesis in C
I printed the notes on plain white paper,
You will find many of these pages here as free downloads for you, just in case you want to start a calendar book of your own. My kids had trouble fitting the letters of the months into the spaces on the Write the Date paper, so I gave you a couple of versions with the months written in for the children in a traceable font. As you can see in the pictures, I added a whole language arts component to our calendar book with the “Word Family of the Day” and the “Sight Word of the Day.” Basically, the children would copy one of the words from the wall per day into their books. I always have these words stapled up next to my calendar (and I change them often, if not monthly) so it was a natural progression for me to include it in our calendar book. I am including these sheets for you as your free download this week, too! Other things we added were:
In the closeups you can see the added wings on some of them, three to be exact, that I really am not sure I care for too much but it was part of the lesson. It did add dimension so I might just fix one of them as it looks a little odd.
Our experience at Wrigley’s corner was great! We had a great supervisor, Levi, who taught us a lot about ecosystem on our field trip. We had lots of fun catching different sorts of organisms and observing them in their natural habitats. Even though it was cold in the beginning we tried our best to make the best of it and it turned out to be a fun day! I would recommend coming to Wrigley’s to anyone and especially the ones that enjoy science, like being outdoors, or if your just looking to have a good time! P.S. you might get a little bit wet!
Hat tip to my good friend Javier for sharing this with me.
At one point on during this trail hike, both crows and a red-shouldered hawk were making quite a bit of noise. It made me wonder if there was an owl nearby, so I watched and waited. After 20 minutes, it went silent, so I continued on. I actually didn’t anything else the rest of hike, but I think I got a fair amount of photos to share.
We may not easily recognize the gifts our parents give us when they are alive, for what they love and aspire to may not rightfully be ours to nurture in our own lives.
(4) Drizzle salad with your favorite store-bought or homemade balsamic dressing. For the directions on how to make my favorite homemade balsamic ~ Honey Balsamic Dressing ~ click here. Serve immediately.
There is no schematic because I didn't have time to draw it, however I have taken pictures of the steps. The pattern is for beginners and quite easy to make.
I cannot imagine the struggle and the strife
I have been asked if I enjoy the “gotcha” moments when I catch citizens in blatant lies while they contest their parking tickets. The truth is that I do not; in fact, it makes me a bit sad. I wonder what has happened to them in their life that they have such little regard for the truth or the law that they would lie, under oath, just to get out of a sixty-dollar (or thereabouts) parking fine. Sure, it makes good fodder for this blog, and I do have real contempt for those who lie after swearing to tell the truth, but I always come away feeling a little bad for the citizen. This next case was no different.
How can you justify that, that's why the economy is in the state it's in
P.S. Does anyone else WAAY over-think these things? I can't just flip to a page...I end up spending a good 5-10 minutes searching for that *perfect* teaser. ;)
So the next visit we had was for shots. That is 4 injections in the thighs. 2 in each leg. When they girls ask me again if they are getting shots, again I lie and say I don't know. So when they ask Dr. Taylor (she not knowing that is why we were there) says no, when in fact that was the main reason we were there. Being pros at shots now, we take one child at a time to a different room, and wait till they return to take the next one. The girls are pretty good at knowing what is going on around them, so as soon as Avery leaves the room (she is crying and screaming) they ask me if they are getting shots, and I can't lie anymore, so I say yes and if you see the picture below:
He started recording with some local underground artists and it went well for a while but he later decided to spread his wings and pursue his own path and squash the whole group idea. “It wasn’t for me, I just didn’t mesh with those brothers, we all had creative differences and like crabs in a bucket they tried to push down each other …not my style” he said
Lightweight sweaters are hung using children’s white plastic hangers from Target. I like folding them over the hanger versus hanging them because it keeps the shoulders from getting annoying points. Yes, that’s my wedding dress in the back. What do you do with that?? The Tory Burch bags are empty, I just like the pattern.
This photo was taken the day after the storm we woke up with a super strong wind and noisy sound of the roofs and we checked out we found the roof and the fences were blown by the wind and some roofs were not ours imagine that...we're still so lucky it's just that compare to others that half of their homes were devastated.
Our world today is so much harder on Mothers but also a lot easier. We have modern conveniences to help our days go smoother. Washing machines, dish washers, clothes dryers, vacuum cleaners, not to mention the myriad of foods we can purchase from the supermarket.
Principle is a word that is rarely heard these days in the Lib Dems. The most that Simon Hughes can manage is an envelope on which he makes political calculations as to what will most benefit a party headed for extinction. But then Hughes was the willing beneficiary of an anti-gay vote against Peter Tatchell in Bermondsey 25 years ago - despite being gay himself.
Can you believe it's Saturday already? Where did this week go??? Well, it's my Saturday as Guest Designer on Everyday Cricut, so if you're coming from there, thanks for stopping by, and feel free to look around the blog here. You can also leave a comment on today's post for a chance to win a custom-embroidered Gypsy tote bag. If you haven't been to Everyday Cricut yet, be sure to pop on over there! Also, I want to give a huge thank you to Emma for being our Guest Designer here yesterday. Didn't she do an amazing job? Thanks, Emma!!
12-Flee-Rekkers - Fandango
2012/05/02
I am a terrible blogger. But I am telling you, this tiny tot is keeping us so busy, we don't have time for much else.
Macari Katherine’s Field Sauvignon Blanc 2008
One of the book cover accounts she had was for Julian Messner, Inc. Publishers, who published a series of books under a line called "A Romance for Young Moderns" beginning in 1946. Louise Altson painted over 20 book covers for this series, several images of which I will present below. The original painting for Prima Ballerina resides with the Altson family.
WAY TO GO VIPERS!!!
But as Garrard would have it, intellectuals should focus on the human rights violations that are undisputed, rather than on the unique case in which a horde of dishonest authors with polished arguments are trying to convince the world that black is white, up is down and Israel is a light unto the nations. She simply doesn't get the basics of intellectual pursuit.
At some point some friends offered to empty the boat of all personal items. I can’t recall exactly when, but the couple who lived on the boat next to ours and she was the one who had found Rob helped along with our other very good friend Mike. They made several trips with vehicles loaded to the rafters and brought all the “stuff” to my house and unloaded in the basement. There was a ton of mechanical/technical items again I knew sort of what they were, but didn’t know what any of it was worth. For now it just made sense to get the boat emptied so it could be shown to prospective buyers.
13. If your child is younger than nine start bed-sharing. No, it’s not bad. Yes, you might have to have sex in the lounge. Yes, it could take up to six months for the kicking to stop. Yes, you might have to avoid some questions. Yes, you will have to keep doing it every night, for years. Yes, there will be times when it’s a pain (vomitting and night-wetting etc). If your child is older than nine, or you just can’t bring yourself to fully bed-share at least stay with them while they go to sleep, and allow them to come into your bed at night if they are worried. For younger teens sit on the end of the bed, and say nothing. Just be there.
HAD I the heavens’ embroidered cloths,
Don't forget to comment on my Basically Bare Final Exam posting! You could win the entire Winter CHA release. You have until March 15th and then Basically Bare will be picking one winner and announcing them on March 16ht. I am keeping my fingers crossed that I pass the exam. There are VERY VERY talented people that are in the running and I am honored to even be a finalist!
I have more recipes, but I am going to tease you with them. Because I am evil (and too lazy to type a real post right now.) In the meantime, check out my newly, and *ahem* finally updated cookie recipe page. Yeah, the last update I posted there was in October, but….I’m a busy girl.
In old Norrath, I had to explain, mobs were not so easily discouraged. A mob will follow you all the way to the end of the zone. And if it is an aggro mob, like the bandits, that werewolf, or Froon you might be making an unplanned run for the zone line if you got caught unaware.
3 needles
When six horses stood reined to the pumpkin coach, now manned by footmen and drivers, Hilda dared to inspect her work. They wouldn’t last long, but great bipping, they looked wonderful! Grandly, she gestured for Cinderella to leave. “Thank you, so much! But…how can I go in rags?”
“Dont cry” he breathed, “i am here with you”
One of the ways I like to practice a language is to read something too difficult for me. I'm relaxed about not understanding two-thirds of it, I learn lots of new words, and I get a sense of achievement from just making sense of the structure of a sentence.
Anyway, I got back to the hotel by means of a detour. I just HAD to see the gun shop, and it was really there. I didn't get close enough to really see much, but there was a gun shop and that was all I needed to know. Later that evening I hear a lot of commotion outside. Police everywhere, and as it turned out today in the news, there's been a bomb scare.
However, there is a fundamental pulse in Self's article I do respond to. Because of the increased commercialism of literary production, this need for clarity appears to have tipped over into the need for 'cosy certainties'. As a writer I've always specifically wanted to avoid the cosy certainties, but as a former schoolteacher I've always felt the need to woo readers, to allow them to feel comfortable in the world of my writing, and indeed get them on my side, before pushing them on further than they may have expected. But as I've said before, this challenge is now all the greater.
There are a couple of critical flaws in this logic. Health warnings only tell people what they have known about smoking since they were about five years old and it takes a massive leap of faith to think that people's decision to smoke will be altered by an few extra milliseconds looking at them. It is simply absurd to believe, in 2012, that people of any age start smoking without being cognisant of the risks.
The major cost in developing FDCs, is the clinical trials, especially for drugs aiming for the WHO pre-qualification regulatory approvals. A seal of approval from WHO would mean that the drug will be bought in bulk by the several international aid agencies that carry out anti-malarial programs in Africa and Southeast/South Asia where malaria is rampant. Once the cost of clinical trials is covered by the DST, it is unlikely that Ranbaxy would have had to invest any significant sum in the development of the drug. Public private partnerships such as this negate the need for monopoly IP measures such as patents or data exclusivity, since the public sector is in effect subsidizing the private sector in drug development. It is also not the first time that somebody proposed this model of developed. Jerome Reichman, for instance has long called for a ‘public goods’ approach clinical trials where the cost is borne by the government in a bid to reduce demands for monopoly IP protections by pharmaceutical companies. You can read his paper over here. (Image from here)
Without further adieu…
According to the firm, each of the TECNO handset has its own selling point, from functional handset, which has the functions such as dual sim dual standby, superior battery life, FM radio, to hot selling handset, like TV mobile phone and touch screen handset in the market.
Thousands of people are dying and many more receiving serious injuries throughout the world as a result of your corporate policies and censorship practice.
Hmmh. Making your writing pay. Novel concept.
Tengo is a typical Murakami male protagonist, fairly passive, at first involved in an affair with an older married woman, emphasizing this as a sort of fetish (perhaps similar to Aomame’s preference for balding men), but this is later dropped when he begins focusing more and more on the memory of Aomame and wanting to find her. I suppose my frustration is that both these characters seem to have quite strong preferences, and then later we’re supposed to believe they have this amazing love for one another having never really connected to one another save the one mystical experience in their youth, they are neither of them to each other what they have been attracted to all along, so why the change?
Favourite Day of the Week: .A day that my husband and I have off together, there aren't many of these.
Virginia Mom got a kick out of Ken as Toulouse-Lautrec because they cut off most of his legs. I enjoyed Ken as Marat relaxing in a bathtub while Assassin Barbie stands behind him with a tiny knife.
sentence imposed by a jury more than 15 years ago.
NAME: EMEKA JOHN PAUL
Aren't they pretty?! In real life they have a really pretty sheen to them.
(Longer pause. Much, much longer.)
to prepare soil for a garden
As the morning progressed, I stayed turned to ESPN. I figured to catch the recap of last night’s Lakers/Celtics game. Maybe an update on the U.S. Olympic efforts. And if I was lucky, even hear mention of baseball’s spring training.
“We need to convince all the opposition to step aside and make this project happen,” he continued, “so we can all pursue the American dream.”
i thought it would be the perfect scale for a single succulent. i put a large handful of pebbles into the bottom if each container, placed the plant on top, and covered the top of the plan with more rocks.
Of course, when that notoriously racist old hack,Yasmin Alibhai-Brown, proved yet again that the band wagon has not yet started rolling on which she would not be amongst the first to plant her ample haunches, and followed Zephjaniah's lead and sent her own medal back, it became clear not much truth was likely to be told about Britain's imperial past.
I painted my model with chainmail from Citadel Colour. You can see the little guy down here, but of course I needed to experiment somewhere else, so he was not the test subject after all. I decided to try this on a piece of plastic scenery I had lying around.
With bloody hands, I say good-bye.
-Whenever you worried about someone else’s approval the man loses respect for you. If you are that girl who’s seeking for validation from him or seeking for compliments from him, men pick up on that and they feed off that. So they know that if they feed you a compliment or just tell you, you look nice they can probably get what they want from you because you’re not comfortable with who you are as a person and my advice to you if that was you or is you, I recommend you really work on yourself, who you are as a person read more self help books or read the bible. Really empower yourself with healthy good mental things that you can tell yourself and not someone else’s validation.
I made these awesome lemon cookies with lemons Dad and Char sent for my birthday. Super lemon flavor. Unfortunately, it's a pretty small recipe. The cookies mysteriously disappeared rather quickly. Must make more.
On Saturday they used to prepare yellu podi (sesame flour with jaggery). I just love this. Some used to prepare it in ball shape and distribute. Here is my version.
Charo
15 Have you ever hidden food to make sure you have "enough?"
Unfortunately, "live blogging" won't be possible due to the lack of WiFi in the facilities holding the event. However, we will endeavour to provide readers with at least one post each day during the conference with summaries of the various presentations. True Restoration Press will later be selling DVDs of the presentations.
With practice, I hope to be able to spread this outwards into other parts of my life. But I often fall into old habits and patterns.
His spokesperson Zweli Mnisi did not comment on the figure, saying only that Mthethwa was in KwaZulu-Natal around December on "official duties", partaking in roadshows aimed at reducing festive season crime. His stay there during April was due to the national elections.
13. Pour the mixture over the filling. Put the flan into the oven for about 30 minutes or until the top has set and is golden.
5. This is going to be a long three weeks if this heat doesn't break...its REALLY FREAKING HOT here.
Someone once told me that if you live in a humid climate, its a good idea to put a few grains of rice in the salt shaker to stop the salt clumping together.
This is the memorial that Pepys commissioned after the death of his wife Elizabeth in 1669 at the age of 29. She is looking directly across to the Navy Office pew where her husband would have sat each Sunday. Samuel and Elizabeth are buried together at the East end of the church 'under the Communion table' according to the burial register.
YES, they really are that big! And YES, they bite! And YES, they are PERVASIVE. Imagine those suckers crawling around in your house. Actually, don't imagine it, because it's just too disgusting/creepy.
So in the end what I spent to upgrade is $230 less than the additional $570 I would have had to spend to get a bike that’s 1 speed higher and has a few better components, BUT is lacking an aero seat post(and the crucial angle that’s supposed to spare the quads)! The Transition Elite AL also lacks internally routed cables, which a lot of tri bikes have. I think I made the right call, especially considering the fact that I always have the option to switch out some of my gear and have a regular road bike if I want! The next best Specialized tri bike,the Transition Comp, is much more of a tri bike(very nice components, aero seat post,cables integrated into the frame) but it costs about $2,500(WAY over my budget)!!!
We all want to change your head
So, anyway.....before September 11th, writing had always been a joy. I was always jotting down ideas and making notes, culling my journal and email for little tid bits to develop - the process of creating something with words felt cathartic and liberating. It was so easy to spew my scattered, incomprehensible thoughts out of my fingertips as words, and stories and poems (and not just in English), typing or scribbling faster than I could think, onto paper, sometimes sending them away, far away - sometimes for someone else to read, and sometimes NOT, to burn, to bury, to delete, to fold up and tuck into my journal...it always helped when I was down or sad or upset and even when it wasn't emotional diarrhea, I enjoyed it immensely, and I loved sharing it with my friends and family.
Team Tish will be doing a few (2-3) posts on healthcare specifically in relation to the budget cuts. We feel this is a timely and appropriate discussion to have following tonight's informative community forum on how healthcare institutions will be affected by the economic bailout and recession, specifically the budgets cuts proposed by Governor Paterson and Mayor Bloomberg on the State and City levels. These cuts have been made public (as most of you probably are aware, the New York City Council Committee hearings concerning the Mayor's financial plan are are being held from November 17-24th). The City Financial Plan updates can be found here: http://www.nyc.gov/html/omb/html/home/home.shtml
-got unengaged
After that project, I was SOLD on sewing! Since those first wonky coasters, I've ventured out to sew everything from tote bags to coffee sleeves, pillowcases (my newest addiction!) to table runners and just about everything in between.
But try to understand, try to understand, oh ... oh ...
Close the oven and let warm up for 5 or so minutes. Then let the jam-jars completely cool down in the oven.
people have told me many
Toriko 177 (18:07 – 20:37)
Lucky thing for me- there is an amnesia maker ( margaritas with salt) and my fabulous friend STELLA to take the edge off!
It has a paved road that runs the length of it and lots of trails that can sometimes be wet and slippery after a rain. It is the not so clearly marked trails that lead you to the most interesting places.
And the guys so do not look like death metal guys. They look much more like Dungeons and Dragons guys.
The ruling African National Congress (ANC) is largely composed of the Xhosa Bantu tribe. The Xhosa are also well- represented among the Africans armed with automatic weapons, who roam the countryside killing Afrikaner farmers. These rural folk - who, by law, must battle their ubiquitous assailants with only a shotgun, a handgun and a legally limited number of rounds at their disposal - are convinced that the assaults are state- sanctioned, the ANC’s idea of an early eviction notice; “land reform,” if you will. The evidence suggests that they may have a point, hence the title pitting the “Kulaks” against the “Xhosa Nostra.”
2. I was on RTE TV at Feile '95 talking to Dustin the Turkey in a portaloo.
You can also follow me if you wanna see my stories of photos
But in 1 year this is 108 EUR. In 5 years this is 540 EUR.
Ice, ice, I tell you, not like the ice queen, but different, glorious ice that burns and freezes and removes all eases, The best ice and the worst ice,
What about a person or creature or what have you that exist only in the imagination of one individual? A stranger who appears in a dream, say? Here the right response is to remind ourselves that we are talking about the semantics of intentional predication, not about private experience. In fact the argument is that there can be no public description of private experience; remember Wittgenstein’s beetle-in-the-box. Note that, to the extent that “interpreting representations” is thought of as a process with a phenomenal component (after all, mustn’t there be “something that it’s like” to interpret a representation?), the putative experience of a representation (can one interpret a representation without experiencing it?) cannot be the criterion for proper intersubjective use of the word (see the discussion of phenomenal predicates in Chapter Three).
So, you’re probably wondering, how does that make these videos a GOOD thing? Sounds pretty awful, right? Well here’s the thing. It’s the in-joke that makes them awesome. Because get this – they’re all called “Twilight” something-or-other. Think about that a second. These horrifying, nightmarishly bad movies that just make you want to root for the end of the world…are all named after the insane cult that’s actually trying to bring ABOUT the end of the world, and restore the Old Gods in some horrifying nightmare apocalypse. Really, let that sink in for a minute.
What’s better than that, chickens?
Nah, this is Macy, mind. And from what she tells me this other guy disnae even know her real name.
Details of release and pricing I don't yet know, but I'm sure ArmChairGeneral will put the information out as soon as it's final, and you can keep up to date with developments as ever through the blog, website or page at Wargame Vault.
Regular Exams
D.H: Doritos as a bribe, burying a cat? Haha. G.E. Has some impressive shtuff: “they make the power that makes the beer.” Got it. The John Carter Disney movie doesn't look all that good.
I’ve waited too long to try and right this down. Life is sure more hectic with two babies than it was with one. I’ll do my best to remember everything. If you are interested in a refresher on Evelyn’s birth story, since I’ll probably be making lots of comparisons, you can find the beginning here.
- from a small Midwestern town to a futuristic hospital run by digitally augmented healers, from the death of an ancient prophet to a forest at the end of time. Inevitably,
I know some of you are interested in my personal life, so I should probably say that our baby is kind of crawling now, though she likes to hold on to fingers and walk more. She's learned how to do the first part of Patty Cake all by herself (the actions I mean, not the singing). She knows to put her hands up when we ask her how big she is, so that we, in chorus, can say "so big." She's adorable... but I'm biased.
Sounds nice, doesn’t it? It is!
"Ellington '66" is an album by American pianist, composer and bandleader Duke Ellington recorded and released on the Reprise label in 1965. The album won a Grammy Award for Best Instrumental Jazz Performance - Large Group or Soloist with Large Group in 1966.
If you happened to hand them to someone who chops as slow as Sarah, feel free to run a marathon, buy a coffee and a snack on your way home, take a nap, and watch a few episodes of lost, as I did, while you wait.
Save us from the time of trial,
And you just went poopoo!
- the porridge at Pret a Manger – with honey and 5 berry compote
They quickly become a favorite couple of E!’s reality television shows. They have the most desirable relationship, to me at least, because they are so real with each other even when most couples fall apart in front of the media, it seems to keep them more down to earth than ever (which is impressive).
This was after over six inches of rain early Wednesday morning and, since the photo was taken around 5:00 p.m., the water had actually receded quite a bit. The spot I usually stand in is just to the left of those saplings. The water was flowing pretty darned fast and we watched an ARMCHAIR float down the river. By tomorrow morning, the flow will be slower and water will be lower, so we will go wet some line and hope the fish are biting. Whatever you do this weekend, I hope it brings you joy! Bead on, beadlings!
Yesterday, a reader asked if I mail internationally. Dude, I'll mail OPE zine to anyone in the world who has four dollars. If you have eight dollars, I'll mail you two.
“So, how’re you doing?”
I had a conversation with my trainer this morning, it is not an original conversation and it goes something like this:
I was very honored when Christina of Greige Design suggested that I could be a guest blogger while she enjoys time away. Blogging has become a very personal journey as I am able to share ideas, design inspirations, travel stories via words and images, an electronic common place book of sorts. My blog Francine Gardner Art De Vivre is a synopsis of who I am, someone who just loves family, life, nature, far away cultures and brings all these experiences into my design work.
Later, when Christianity began to take hold, November 1 became All Saints Day in remembrance of saints and martyrs, and November 2 was declared All Souls Day to honor the dead. Eventually, the period from October 31 to November 2 became known at Hollowmas, with the term hallow being Old English for holy, which has developed over time into today’s Halloween.
I looked on Pinterest which is an evil site for someone on a diet....
I just read this great post from Dr. Charles Raison. He was answering a question from a person stating that they were battling what felt like a sugar addiction. Here is the link: http://www.cnn.com/2010/HEALTH/expert.q.a/04/27/sugar.addiction.raison/index.html
The double chocolate stout is a crowd pleaser.... or a friend pleaser since my friend Bryan really likes it. Our plan is to split this up and flavor each part a bit differently. We may go with three different kinds of chocolate or do chocolate raspberry. More here as we get some idea of what we'll do.
Mouthfeel (0-3): Medium body with good carbonation. 3 points
By far the biggest underwriter is Coca-Cola (KO, Fortune 500), which gives just under $1 million annually, according to a source with knowledge of the business. (The company declines to comment.) Coke gets an understated 15-second commercial at the beginning and end of the broadcast -- just as other "major" underwriters do on PBS programs. Bloomberg LP also gets a special mention.
Cheers to Wim the Tim from Leeds for answering the questions. Feel free to get in touch with Johnny (@johnnybhoy58 on twitter) if you are looking for a CSC in or around Leeds.
Mr Gan said MOH is in the midst of studying the options available.
Hope you rise to the challenge! Looking forward to reading what you come up with.
their case to SANTA (Billy Gardell). Meanwhile, Manny, ELLIE (Queen
“What does the lion say?”
The Goal: Chance says that at Martin City Brewing Company, they have one overall goal: Be amazing. Of course, in addition to that, they have lots of other plans that go beyond simply brewing beer. "We hope to facilitate a range of collaborative projects-from tasting contests that lead to full scale production to teaming up with local home brewers for small scale batch barrel aging. You could say one of our goals is to engage the Kansas City community in having as much fun with beer as we do!"
It was not long before I made my first effort at loading hay. I was very young, but thought I had loaded it all right. When on the way to the barn, the wheel of the wagon struck a rock, and off went the hay. I fell to the ground with the load on top of me; this was soon removed, and aside from a little smothering I was unhurt.”
Please read the user manual carefully before assembling and flying the RC helicopter to avoid any unnecessary damage.
Article 9
"Yes, maybe," she responded, but she couldn't withhold the gasp and moan as he palmed her breast. The nipple pebbled below his ministrations and Elise could feel the tingles of arousal spread throughout her entire body. She could feel his impressive erection pressed into the cleft of her ass. She wiggled her butt a little to give him some friction. His eyes darkened and he suddenly sprang up, continuing to hold her in his arms. "Let's take this upstairs," he growled.
I would suggest it t be LEVEL 3 – It feels good in the moment, is not good for them, not good for others and certainly does not serve the greater good.
In 1897, Bayer employee Felix Hoffman found a way to create a stable form of the drug that was easier and more pleasant to take. (Some evidence shows that Hoffman's work was really done by a Jewish chemist, Arthur Eichengrun, whose contributions were covered up during the Nazi era.) After obtaining the patent rights, Bayer began distributing aspirin in powder form to physicians to give to their patients one gram at a time. The brand name came from "a" for acetyl, "spir" from the spirea plant (a source of salicin) and the suffix "in," commonly used for medications. It quickly became the number-one drug worldwide.
1. Be more organized. My craft desk has been a mess all these years! Even my 4-year-old son as me why my desk is so messy! LOL
Utilizing an LCD display speaker phones that have the nec mobilepro 9000 about every month. To get acquainted with the nec mobilepro 400 of money they have formed a set of cost-effective, high ease of use of graphic card that will certainly permit every person to obtain a complete bunch of computer software. The software line will not cost much and may aid businesses find exactly what needed. Before deciding on an authentic supplier, invest time to assess making different findings. It is very easy to find the proper system.
Promotional materials – 40 postcards, 40 leaflets and 10 posters
Mountain Goat Brewery and their trusty pet Tom Delmont along with your very own Beer Bloke, Prof Pilsner, will combine to present a beery degustation of lofty proportions at Beer Deluxe on Thursday March 10.
Theirs but to do & die,
Or at least I'll be feeling like I have.
What the patrons of the Starbody Health Spa should be fearing is the spa itself. Whether it be scalding sauna steam, loose diving board screws, or shower tiles masquerading as deadly projectiles, there is definitely something iffy going on at this place. Owner Michael Evans (William Bumiller), still shaken by the recent suicide of his wife Catherine (Shari Shattuck), is concerned that his current ladyfriend Laura (Brenda Bakke) is going down the same road that his paraplegic, self-immolating spouse did when her eyes get burned by low grade chlorine vapor while sprawling seductively in the spa's state-of-the-art sauna. To make matters worse, while detectives (Francis X. McCarthy and Rosalind Cash) are investigating the sauna incident, a woman in an extremely tight one-piece swimsuit takes an awkward tumble off a faulty diving board. Oh, and shortly after that, a musclebound fella nearly gets torn to pieces by a yellow weight machine.
Been laying on the sofa for days with a rug over me, a jar of Vicks to sniff and 4 seasons of Supernatural to keep me company.
So I started with a couple small goals and as time went on I felt that they were too easy and added more. I started with trying to make organic and natural products have more prominence in my life through the products I use. If my dollar counts as a vote I want my to some more than that I grabbed the first thing that I came across at the grocery store. I feel that buying more natural and organic ideas is a way for me to treat my body better and to encourage the people that grow or make the products that it is worth it to grow and that people care.
Ink: Memento Black, Copic Markers
Text 47
TONGA / NIUE / KERMADEC IS / AMERICAN SAMOA / SAMOA /
Imagine spending a week trekking across the Sahara, walking long distances in high temperatures by day and camping under the stars at night - all to help dogs. That's what Ross Thornhill is doing for us, and he could do with some pennies and pounds in the pot to encourage him along the way.
The rain is here....finally.
A damned Viking warrior.
-Rookie RG Danny Watkins got reps with the 1st team offense between RT Austin Howard and C Jason Kelce, (who’s been swapping in and out with C Jamaal Jackson today). Watkins also got some 3rd string reps with the offensive line. The Eagles are hoping he’ll start this year, and Watkins needs as many reps as he can get after his 5 day “holdout.”
If every plan
Aconite petals are gleaming with frost, but their yellow is trying to shine.
With the summer season coming up, there are many exciting opportunities coming up to get involved at the Missions Base. There are 3 summer internships being offered at various times throughout the summer.
Hey! Ok, so the EMA's are being hosted in Belfast this year (where I spend most of my time), of all places in Europe, it's not some major European capital or anything, but Belfast wtf.
June 26 - July 3 - Need coverage
To often I see historical romance pitch copy that reads something like this: she’s desperate but the belle of the ball and he’s a rake. It’s too generic. I need some original element (character, plot device, etc.) to grab my interest or I’ll pass.
Through a collection of courageous acts, Viet Khang was able to capture the attention of the entire world. With the help of Mr. Truc Ho, Viet Khang’s music has shown the world the sad way of life that the Vietnamese people are faced with every single day. Viet Khang painted the crimes of the Communist Party, making it crystal clear to every Vietnamese across the world.
Hot time get it while it's easy
(All images taken with my old Nikon Coolpix during a recent drive to work)
With my best wishes to everyone
bla bla bla no passed words. The mostest impawrent
-Today I have another list of a 398 things to do. I’m learning its going to be like this everyday for the rest of my life. Fuck that too. I just want to sit. Today we are celebrating W’s birthday, which is actually Thursday but we are flying to South Carolina on Thursday for a family wedding so today is the day. Dad and Susie are coming for dinner and my house is a mess. So on top of getting the last few doors painting in the kitchen hall to the garage I need to go to the store, clean my house, finish multiple loads of laundry, scrape paint off the kitchen floor, and feed them. Shit.
A few of these are items I'm trying to finish off, but ended up liking more than I had figured, and a few are items I've been using for months, but never got around to featuring.
Back to that lie that I had told myself about my medication making me not able to lose weight: I can tell you now, it was a complete and TOTAL LIE. I have lost weight… an amazing amount of weight, over 85 lbs., to be exact. I went from a size 14-16, to a size 6. As of right now, I have an amazing size 4 dress that’s waiting to be worn to my cousin’s wedding in March, and I WILL fit into it.
The delightful Mynx of Lizard Happy recently ran a giveaway on her site where every comment you left counted as an entry. Because I am a commenting machine, I commented at least once every day. Even so I wasn't expecting to win. Well guess what happened? I won of course. Well, there were four winners (pretty sure it was four anyway) but I don't think I've ever won something. Especially a giveaway. Hell I barely ever win at things like tombolas. So yes I was very happy to have won something. Plus I think her art is really good, so it does feel good to own something she painted. It arrived on Saturday but I've kind of been waiting for the right time to post about it. That time is right here, right now.
Our silverbeet was a success! With 6 big bunches to sell at $1 a bunch, we had sold 3 bunches before even reaching the stall. Wow! 3 bucks! Like they all say, its not about the money, although N and G oogled over our 3 gold coins with amazement that their parents were able to make money so easily.
* You also write under the pseudonym, Gabriella Poole, for the Darke Academy series. Could you tell us about this method of writing? Do you think there is much difference between writing a novel of your own making or writing for a series such as Darke Academy? Do you approach them in much the same way or are your methods and style strictly dictated by other factors? If several authors are involved, do you all have to conform to an in-house style?
These paintings have a lot of light in the application of neon and metallic spray paint. In Day-Glo they reflect 110%. The silver paint hits your eyes like chrome on a hot summer day.
ADDITIONAL TOPPINGS:
6+: Goldnight redeemer(W), Voice of province(W), Havengul skaab(U)
With that said, the article moves into how values influence the dynamics of business.
for providing me with this source.
If you have any tips or thoughts you want to share on how you simplify your stash or life, please share. I would love to hear what you do.
This is just one of the ways in which we get a sense of Clare as a prisoner. She also feels like a prisoner in her own home (the one she now shares with her help, husband having left for another woman, daughter disappeared, son living elsewhere) with its high level of security, a feeling only intensified by the home-invasion chapters. But Clare has also exiled herself. It is as though nothing outside the walled perimeter matters to her anymore; it is only her memories, her ghosts and her need for forgiveness that preoccupy her now; it is as though these will be her only companions until death finally comes. There are two relationships at the centre of this, the first with her daughter Laura who, as I mentioned earlier, has gone missing.
As such, I find it impossible to define, clearly at least, just how captivating the film is, how breathlessly its story develops through each vivid tableau, and how much the use of the camera - blocking and revealing objects like the orbiting planets of the opening scene - creates a feeling of dizzying insanity, as tangible for the audience as the plague of madness that descends upon its characters. This is something that cannot be explained, only experienced.
In addition to this I have some thoughts on some things I might like to do at work when it comes to reading and getting my students to read more, and I might write about those efforts here.
Being a parent has been the happiest, rewarding, scary, most painful and gut wrenching experience of my life. I have a grown son (grown by legal standards, that is.) I spent the better part of the past two years trying to save him from himself...from making bad decisions that could affect the rest of his life. I failed, probably because it was never my battle to win. The more frightened I got about his chosen paths, the more I attempted to tighten my grip and control. Seeing my young self in him was terrifying to me, you never want your children to go through the same horrible phases you went through, you want them to learn from your experiences. Funny how they don't see it that way. Yeah, we didn't take anyone's word for it either. Go figure.
- red deer pot roast banger, carmelized cherry smashed and bourbon butter with Backwoods Bastard
5. A Nightingale Sang In Berkeley Square
It is easy to criticise China, but much of the criticism doesn’t take into account the historical context of their development, and the urgent requirement for economic growth as a precondition for social justice and progress. Nor do the critics acknowledge the degree to which the Communist Party of China is self-aware of the difficulties and negative aspects of Chinese society – but there are often no easy answers to solve problems overnight.
On the other hand, heavy-handed(using the definition of harsh,oppressive and melodrama) films mostly bang their message loud and clear without leaving any shit behind. They use bombastic music and melodramatic dialog to tell you how you should feel in this instance. They have loud, over the top action and stuff that just get their message across without holding anything back. There are sure no room for introspection within the film because everything is spelled up clearly for you.
Over the Holidays Audrey has been growing and changing so fast. She has started crawling and she is quick as lightning! I'm chasing her all over the house as she chases what ever catches her fancy. It's busy work!
At fourteen years of age I split my left instep open with an ax which went almost through my foot. I suffered intensely from this injury, and my foot was nine months in getting well.”
Payment of your session fee locks in your date and time.
Finally, if you are in Asbury Park this October, why not join in the annual New Jersey Zombie Walk? It's lovely by the seaside, even when it's covered in gore. And it makes a great antidote to the Jersey Shore. (Snookie as a zombie, now that I'd watch.)
Example. ”I’ll never leave you hangin’. Something today is going to lead you to something tomorrow.” What he’s saying is that he uses foreshadowing, isn’t creating tangents, and everything is essential to the story. There are so many others where he goes on for paragraphs about little details that I just couldn’t bring myself to transcribe.
Here is a photo if the inside of the card.......Unfortunately I do not have a record where I found the inside digi image but ifI can findit I will update this post to give proper credit.
And then alone in the night, I still called out for You
Bang per buck isn’t just about alcohol content, it’s also about how good the lout is and this lout really is top stuff for the buttons being charged. There is no such thing as bad cooking lager, it is all good, but some arguably is better than others. The way you decide this is by necking everything that is cheap and deciding for yourself what you like, and I really quite like this one.
Starting today for two weeks I am the featured artist at the Art Hive as part of their Hand of The Maker series. I had a hard time finding the time to make product but had a blast with these projects. I went with a Fly Away With Me theme - with butterflies, birds, kites and hot air balloons. I have been on a new personal adventure to rediscover who I am (signed up for the Soul Restoration Brave Girls Club and sooo excited!!) and birds/butterflies/kites and hot air balloons mean so much to me as they symbolize freedom - freedom of truth :)
So I wore these as 'walking to work' shoes for the days I wore heels. They have hippos on them which automatically makes them awesome.
There has been one key change since the course was first mooted this time last year. The school – and training centre – has moved. In its old premises there was only one, portable projector and a fairly shaky portable ebeam. They weren’t used much in class, and weren’t used on the certificate courses at all – except for one input session where we talked about ways of exploiting digital images and video clips. In September the school moved into its new premises. There are ceiling bracketed projectors and wifi access in all the rooms. Use of the technology has been integrated into all the classes – it’s part and parcel of the school. And it’ll be part and parcel of the training courses this summer – for trainers and trainees alike.
I remember picturing the dark waters closing over my mother's head as I held a shivering indistinct female.
Mommy smiled, and this wasn’t the lip-stretcher she employed on the police, but a real one, bitter and secretive. “The bitch thought she was going to get rid of me. She was going to take my kids, Keith, to add insult to injury. Don’t tell me you would’ve done any different.”
The city was festive. In preparating for Easter holy days all the churches were decorated with these sawdust drawings. On sunday there was a huge parade through town which drew hundreds of thousands of spectators.
For instance, when we had the opportunity to sell India the upgraded F-16′s, we chose not to do that. We did the same with Taiwan. The point is, our allies need to understand clearly that we are their friends, we will be standing by there with them.
“Born in Switzerland, Ducros trained in Geneva before traveling to Rome in 1776. There he quickly established himself as a specialist in large, highly finished topographical landscapes in watercolor, which were prized for their realism by visitors on the Grand Tour. In 1779 Ducros entered into a partnership with the printmaker Giovanni Volpato to produce engraved souvenir views of Rome. Volpato, who had settled in Rome in 1771, was famous for his engravings after Raphael’s frescoes in the Vatican logge. The partnership of Ducros and Volparo flourished, and in 1780 they issued their first series of prints, Vues de Rome et des ses environs, which was published in Rome to great commercial success.”
(3) The first known use of the word in Christian writings was by Paul, who referred to the message about salvation through Christ. It was not until the writings of Justin Martyr in the mid-second century that the term began to be used specifically in reference to scriptures about the deeds and teachings of Jesus of Nazareth.
DH: “Hello mate, are you with Dylan for the Deaf?”
I ran almost 30km’s in 2.5 hours – VERY happy with this effort! By the end of it my legs were cramping, but all I could think was “maintain this pace, you will finish the race in 3.5hrs”, and it certainly is starting to feel much more achievable. I dont plan on realigning the goal posts just yet though and will be happy to finish in under 4 hours when the big one comes along.
When I looked out my window this morning I wanted to go straight bacck to bed though. The world was all white, covered in snow. Heavy, wet snow. Yet I did rise and had my breakfast. Made my way out through the snow to the mailbox to collect the Saturday morning paper. Read it.
"I DID WHAT I HAD TO DO. AND I HAVE NEVER LOOKED BACK....."
“They say that fella you’re dating is the biggest jackass north of the Rio Grande!” he would say to Lucy with a malevolent sneer.
I can actually illustrate this one with a video!
Lompoc Brewing Portland SummerAid Golden Ale Way too light.
New pleasures
pushing against the insides
Here's how the contest works, the person who comments below and picks what number out of 2010 closest to this particular card will be awarded the card and will also receive the ten cards of their favorite team. If their happens to be a tie, I will figure out what happens.
The image, that comes out of the camera looks like this.
The experiment is curious one especially considering its funding sources namely the U.S. Office of Naval Research (ONR), the Air Force Office of Scientific Research and the National Science Foundation. Seeing that the ONR is responsible and at the very least facilitates acts of espionage, one may question why they are so interested in funding an experiment which has the potential to teach us how to better manipulate decision makers.
So, this trial was not about my position on Muslims killing American civilians. It was about my position on Americans killing Muslim civilians, which is that Muslims should defend their lands from foreign invaders – Soviets, Americans, or Martians. This is what I believe. It’s what I’ve always believed, and what I will always believe. This is not terrorism, and it’s not extremism. It’s what the arrows on that seal above your head represent: defense of the homeland. So, I disagree with my lawyers when they say that you don’t have to agree with my beliefs – no. Anyone with commonsense and humanity has no choice but to agree with me. If someone breaks into your home to rob you and harm your family, logic dictates that you do whatever it takes to expel that invader from your home.
The man whose story helped so many drift off to sleep has gone off to his own land of dreams. “Oh please don’t go – we’ll eat you up – we love you so.” -Where the Wild Things Are, Maurice Sendak
Amphibians… Larvae of newts, frogs and toads will be metamorphosing. Markings start showing through and their legs slowly develop.
Speaking of Racer 5, they serve a Black IPA version of it here, called Black Racer, where the coffee-like like bitterness of the malt melds with the bitter hops creating a very bitter, yet mellow and easy drinking experience. Finally, Linda and I split a Racer 10, a Imperial IPA version of Racer 5 for "dessert". I'm beginning to appreciate why so many West Coast style IPA's taste even better in Imperial form, as the extra malt and associated sweetness just seemed to give the hops an extra juiciness and fullness.
“If it’s never our fault, we can’t take responsibility for it. If we can’t take responsibility for it, we’ll always be its victim.” ~ Richard Bach ~
The entire hillside was spotted with deer, which stood out boldly against the fresh snow. Literally, every square centimeter of my viewfinder was filled with deer. I was mesmerized by the sight and stopped counting to take pictures to document this most unusual scene.
With flames from the dragon of darkness,
But before I get to the extra-terrestrial DNA and what I am understanding about that, I want to take a minute to talk about those amazing folks who seemed to know all about our DNA… the Maya.
Article 111
depressing note for me, and
mess (this he learned from me constantly saying that the doggy makes a mess)
I have also been told by others how they cannot fathom making such a decision. How it is so final. How it means no more, and they can't imagine doing it. This makes me laugh. As clearly, it means they are not ready. They do not want to close that chapter of their lives yet.
you do whatever it takes
The Lagavulin-aged barleywine was what I was most excited to try, but it
I seem to be rapidly approaching my goal of becoming an important part of the internet because I woke up this morning to a string of badly misspelled hate mail and syntax-free angry comments. Normally, this would have made me crumple into a heap of trembling anxiety and self-hatred, but for the last few weeks, I have been secretly training to withstand superhuman amounts of hatred by hitting myself in the face with a bag full of bird carcasses, so I'm ready for this.
And here is my card...(click on the image of the card to get a better look at the sentiment. Sorry it didn't show up better.)
And all I needed was a little prayer, a few candles, and an awesome writing buddy.
Well you see, the company has been using "Sofa King Low" for the last ten years.
According to Justice Department statistics, the total value of confiscated property exceeded $2.5 billion in 2010, more than double from five years ago. The average take per case? $166,000… and the vast majority of cases were non-criminal.
I've decided to note which giveaways aren't open internationally. The default will be open worldwide, meaning I'll only note if they have restrictions.
5. Laurie
The clerk put in 2.8, I mounted the lensbaby on the camera and turned it on the clerk. Took a snap. A blur of a face. Great!
PS: Some of my friends were complaining that I was getting too busy with Haiku...so my apologies to them...I'll soon be back with something other than Haiku...thanks for having patience and bearing with me... :D :D :D
Of course I love seeing Manny piling hollow blocks! I love to see him without the benefit of lights, camera, and director.
My computer is located on the first floor in a room with a sliding glass door that opens into our dog/chicken yard. We never use the door for entering or exiting the room and instead just view it as a very large window in the room. It brings light.
The global MBA provided me a framework within which I experienced working with people from different parts of the world. True learning takes place when you invest time and emotional energy to engage with those around you. This fosters a larger point of view and helps one to face reality, make decisions, have the courage to act, all to build a globally focused future.
That’s why we were here. On this world. An isolated world. Isolated for thousands of years. It’s cities had long ago turned to dust. And its human population had reverted to tribal clans. They were even losing both their written and spoken languages. They had long ago forgotten about us. Long ago lost the ability to use machines. To make machines. They could make spears. They could hunt. And they could forage.
Tx fans take note. Today at Nike Outdoor Southlake Carroll won the Distance Medley (Lowe, 4:05 anchor) and The Woodlands won the 4 x Mile.
And sweat-caked in smoke, and cauldrons to stoke
Your gF score can be raised by doing new things (novelty), challenging yourself, being creative, doing things the hard way, and networking. Todays games require multitasking masters! Kids can do this and thereby they are able to land those freakin planes.
Full of personality and color, it is a prize example of their work. I case you can't find room for a cupboard, they make tons of smaller pieces of folk art that are just delightful.
These are all first drafts/roughs, so I’m open to altering anything in them should any good suggestions be submitted!
Anticipating a busy-ish weekend, so BTO (Boast, Toast, Oath.. not to be confused with Bachman Turner Overdrive) will be a few days early this month! Go me!
Here is this little guy, not yet two. He's learned so much but still had so much to learn. He could not yet know what was real and what was make believe. He did not yet understand the nuances of our language. This child (as are all children) was literal. What he was watching was a very unpleasant scene where a man was threatening someone with a gun and he was soaking it all up like a sponge. Is this one of the first scenes I wanted my child to witness? If it was real would I try to shield it from him? The answers came flooding in. If this was really happening I would be horrified that my son was a witness to it, yet to him IT WAS really happening and HE WAS witnessing it!
“You guys! You guys! Oh my God. Ray Charles is dead!” I said, gasping and flailing my arms.
natural rubber “tire” surrounding the central bell, it's great for tough chewers. The tires ensure a toy that is easy for your dog to grab onto and carry around in his mouth. The Jingle X-Tire Ball is durable and fun.
Juan, the fact is that more people have been put on food stamps by Barack Obama than any President in American history. I know among the politically correct you are not supposed to use facts that are uncomfortable. Second, you are the one who earlier raised the key point. The area that ought to be I-73 was called by Barack Obama “a corridor of shame” because of unemployment. Has it improved in three years? No. They haven’t built a road, they haven’t helped the people, they haven’t done anything.
- A.C. Crispin
On our very last day we were there, miracle of miracles, we saw a tiny spot of blue sky peeking through the clouds. We all ran outside to witness the sky. By mid-morning the sky was completely blue and the sun was shining. We decided to stay an extra day and made a mad dash for the beach. Me and Phil went earlier in the day (without baby) and later in the afternoon took Audrey for her first experience with the ocean.
“They lead out of luxury and they should know that luxury has identity signatures” he said.
I don't share personal stories very often because I'm a fairly private person learning to open up more, but I've also struggled with whether or not I should share personal stories on my blog. Would anyone be interested? But here goes......
I just learned of a trail marker tree that was chopped down this year, unknowingly, by a property owner along the shoreline of Lake Erie at Port Dover. Once dead, or removed, we lose their untold stories, stories that tell us about who we are and where we come from, stories we can share with future generations about this very special land, and the incredible people that walked and marked its forest paths.
Hope everyone has a lovely weekend!
The 99%:
Ska Brewing Co. Decadent Imperial IPA
Pride of the Yankees – 1
That you need to sacrifice everything for art …That you splintered into
After early suspicions that one of the bombs was planted, police said both blasts were suicide attacks.
taking lovers to advance various causes at the request of her ‘handlers’). She had lost her shine much earlier and was considered passé by 1863 when she wore the costume of a Queen of Ertruria for another grand fancy-dress ball. Her performance was lauded by the press but ridiculed by her detractors (most notably, the Empress and former fan, Princess Mernich).
1) Chicken starts looking a little listless and less lively.
62% of students said that they had been cyberbullied by another student at school and 46% had been cyberbullied by a friend;
Where did the fecking spellchecker go?
But so is the NaNoWriMo, and that didn’t stop us, now did it?
Positives: Combines speed, balance, quickness, vision and crisp cuts to leave defensive backs and linebackers in the dust. Very good hands, accepts the ball fluidly on most throws and is ready to make a play afterwards. Makes catches in traffic, even going up over taller defenders with vertical and toughness. Flashes the foot quickness and toughness to handle slot duties at the next level and lines up all over the field. Dangerous with the ball in his hands.
Broth: You can choose from any of the four options at the top of the menu, from basic pork to soy sauce flavored, to "rich and fatty" with black garlic oil, or spicy. I LOVED the monthly special at Ramen Jinya that has the black garlic oil, so that's the one I went for.
*Scissors
If you are interested in Titanic at all, I highly recommend this book. 4 stars.
is the version of truth I travelled here with
A: A person who buys airtime and ad space on your business’ behalf.
and most of all, don’t forget the Man above.
It is relief for my troubled, cold soul. Let the ice melt away, let me live again.
Barked the greyhound to Shag.
I am, as you know, a fan of US blogs and I have met many amusing and interesting US lawyers (and non-lawyers) through blogging, my podcasts and Twitter. I am delighted to say that I have been invited by Molly McDonough, Assistant Managing Editor/Online for the ABA Journal, to write a piece for the ABA Journal Legal Rebels project which is due to run shortly….
the grass
“Really,” I protest. “I’ve never liked walnuts. Ever notice that they look like brains?” I can tell that Henry doesn’t believe me. But he needs it more than I do.
So there we go. That's the end of the (true) fairy tale and I hope all involved live happily ever after.
*Also, when you're focused on surviving, you don't care about all your "STUFF". When things are back to normal, I'll be doing a VERY deep clean to get rid of lots of superfluous CRAP.
It's Canada Day today and, to celebrate, a very light rain fell in the morning. I was grateful for that because I wasn't feeling great and didn't feel like hauling (yet more) stones. The weather somehow justified staying indoors. In addition, the harvest wheat I planted a week ago started to germinate and I wondered whether I would have to figure out a way to irrigate it. Problem solved, for now.
Here is today's update from the info site:
The book begins with a small play—much in the sparse, absurd style of something by Beckett; including actors such as “Occupant” and “Intruder”, three card “Players” and most notably, the “Radio”. The latter mediates a setting-less foreground through which the other characters interact and also figures as a central character in itself. The rest of the lengthy work (almost 300 pages) is made up of prose blocks set off by headers like “RADIO:” and “TELEVISION:”, long prose sections interspersed with verse fragments, epistolary passages with subtitles/lines of address such as “Dear Surveillance Photo Aged by Speculation”, and prose portions which are narrated as “transmissions” and bracketed by lines that read “...Channel open. Shutdown protocol unsuccessful....” There is also a section that consists of blank rectangles and numbered prose segments; it is a “shot list” and a series of “film stills”. Here a voice says, “Attach the feed. We are aiming at a movie.”
Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Oil or ghee - 1 - 2 tbsp
But, when I mean it, it’s a full-body, unchanging truth.
I know that I have the only surviving copy of that time.
Well, hurry and start selecting your choices. For further enquiries, do not hesitate to contact via their question forms on the page or drop them mail at Ocision Sdn Bhd, 3-5 Avenue, Jalan Masjid PJU 6A, 47400 Petaling Jaya, Selangor, Malaysia and call at 016-3110394 (Advertising) and 03-374502340 (24 Hours Customer Support). You could even drop them an email at support@ibilik.com. You could surf their blog too at blog.ibilik.com.
Frugal Fashion Tip: Shopping burns a lot of energy. So you might be tempted to buy an Auntie Anne’s pretzel or Orange Julius while shopping. Save yourself some money and calories, and eat a healthy snack before leaving home. I recommend something like greek yogurt or oatmeal with blueberries. Both will keep you feeling fuller longer, but not so full you’ll dread trying on clothes.
My eyes cut to my six-year-old sister in the twin bed across from mine, sound asleep and sucking her thumb like a starving piglet—which was actually quite brilliant. Plugging one's mouth and positioning one's fist that close to one's nasal orifice was the ideal blockade for behemoths on the prowl. But my fate augured differently and, finally, I succumbed to tears.
3 objects
The actual Chapel lies beyond many halls and below several floors of the museum, or so it seemed. After the twentieth room/passage/alcove/set of stairs it was hard to tell. We walked through gallery spaces where we saw a Matisse and a couple of Dalis – which was a nice contrast with some of the more gruesome religious art, of slayings and decapitations (as was in vogue at the time.) At each bottle-necked corridor it was one step forward, two steps back, with tour groups moving through like a mass of wandering ghosts, linked by their brightly coloured transistors and a knack for bumping into you. The crowd was like a train of cattle in many ways, it also moved without grace, rigid and processional without the same sense of purpose. Occasionally an arm would steal above the din and at its top, like a star on a Christmas tree, was the unblinking eye of a camera. Then it would retract, almost with shame.
- For anonymous (preferably none), leave your email address and where you're located at
One of my gifts from Tim at Christmas was a black sweatshirt with the above thought in white gothic letters. I love it. I personalized it for my friend and on the back of the library card, I printed a bunch of quotes about books.
At conception the etheric mould is created for the physical form
At the start of the game my grav-tanks stay close to the jetbikes and vypers with two roles in mind. The first is to add a few more shots into the target- since jetbikes and vypers are so fragile, anything that comes into range of the warhost and that is a threat needs to be ten out 100%. Tactical marines land in a drop pod point blank- that tac squad his to go! Jetbikes alone with doom won’t do it, so they need the help of the vypers and grav-tanks for a final push. Up close I can drop two full units a turn with average rolling.
Last year, the Freedom mine produced 1.2 million tons of thermal coal, which is burned to generate steam for producing electricity at power plants. It has won several safety awards including top national honors from the U.S. Labor Department’s Mine Safety and Health Administration for its safety record in 1995 after the mine — which at the time employed 83 people — logged 213,878 work-hours without a lost-time injury or death.
Morello: Well, okay. Fair enough. I admire that.
Mort
After the hospital stay I sought counseling for a number of issues and gained a lot of knowledge and perspective. After a few weeks of talking it out, I was in a better place emotionally. My counselor urged me to write a letter to Leah about my feelings towards her, specific memories that pained me, and more importantly, letting go of what I longed to have with Leah, a friendship. Leah was unsafe for me. It was the unattainable dream and only brought me pain when I would seek it. I had to let her go, in order to heal and move forward. I never gave the letter to Leah because it wasn’t actually for her. It was for me. I started over with Leah like she was someone I just met. I treated her as an acquaintance. I was cordial and never talked about anything other than surface. She was unsafe for me at that time and for my heart and well-being I had to keep her at an arm’s length. We went on for several years like this and I began to feel better in regards to Leah. I had essentially mourned the loss of a close sisterly relationship, and replaced it with something different. We still had our spats but generally, this new approach to a relationship went well. I lowered my expectations of her so I wouldn’t be let down, therefore, rarely became angry or disappointed. I know that sounds terrible, but it’s true and it’s what I had to do to be in contact with Leah.
Welcome to another By The Cute and Girly Challenge! Thanks to everyone who joined in with last month challenge. Remember to check back to see if you have won a prize or have been chosen as a guest designer for July.
Top with syrup, fruit
It is a shame that both the original man (the African Bushmen) our real connection with the origin of humanity and the Afrikaner who re-discovered and joined him are threatened 'tribes' today - with very little representation in Southern Africa.
This, however, doesn’t mean that you can’t just sit down one day and write a book one day. Even a six year old can cover a whole canvas with paint, and it can even look artsy, so why can’t you cover a book’s pages with letters? Who knows, it might even look booksy… (not sure if that is a word, but I’m just going to go with it)
Lt. Kevin Christopher Dowdell, 46, New York, N.Y.
Some of my favourite moments came from the friendly event volunteers and cheering crew who gave me a big cheer each time I passed time. I believe watching me running along in my Sarong gave them a brief respite from their hardworking night. Cheers to all of you!!!
Won't lie that I completely forgot what this band said they were playing between downloading their EP and playing it for the first time. The pleasure I got when I heard some real smoothly done yet heavy post-rock was amazing. Instantly I recalled how much I enjoyed music like this done by Kinski, Lebanon and Maserati. Guitar, bass and drums blending together yet all distinctly separate to form of psychedelic experience that with a feel beer inside of you can make transcendental.
"OK" she sez grabbing the toolbox "let.s....(etcetcetc)" and I am like
525,600 minutes: How do you measure,
1 forelimbs
This is the first book I’ve read written by Renee Pace, I have to say I really enjoyed her writing; I picked up this book and never put it down. Renee’s writing is suburb, her character descriptions and plot are written well and words flowed easily. Before I knew it I was at the end of the story. I really enjoyed Off Limits even though it talks about some hard topics. I have to say that I felt for the two main characters and I was pulling for their friendship. Excellent writing.
Atelier Cologne Bois Blonds
Of course, I wouldn't be where I am today without the fabulous folks that have featured my blog posts and ideas! So of course, they are deserving of their own tab as well!
It’s not just advertising, though. There’s absolutely nothing I hate more than the guy who constantly makes the easiest joke. I dunno.. I’m a snob I guess. What fun is it to make the first joke that comes to your mind? It doesn’t take skill, or smarts, or timing to hear someone say something is “hard” and throw out a “that’s what she said”… It requires no more thought than saying the pledge of allegiance. We hear the key word, and our mouth starts moving before even considering the how fucking lazy it is... I admit it… I do it do, but I try not to. I try to let someone else take the easy joke.
He said the body of work was not sufficient and I ended up writing some dull paper on "Demonology And Witchcraft In English Renaissance Drama."
-sellout of national property
The endless production of tomatoes (not only from my own garden, but also the garden at the farm) has changed that. I have found myself with so many tomatoes that I just didn't know what to do with them all. One can only use so much salsa, pasta sauce, plain sauce, pizza sauce, and tomato soup. I found myself searching for something else to make use of these glorious, red orbs and landed on Tomato Jam.
Because we talk about films, dammit.
from there we hit the road with todd phillips' due date (2010).
As the laughing Accountant grew more and more comfortable with me, the laugh grew louder and even more obnoxious to the point where I couldn't even look this guy in the face anymore! It didn't help that every single time I locked eyes with someone else in that room, they mouthed the words "Oh My God" to me! (OK - only one person actually did that, but still!) I even tried to approach the subject by mentioning that his laugh was very distinct and loud and that others in the restaurant were giving us looks - but dude didn't get the hint.
but my mom volunteered to take care of it. The traditional birth
Well, duh. Thanks for the bulletin, lady. What will you tell me next? That it snows in Winnipeg? That Adam Sandler makes bad movies? That I shouldn’t buy green bananas? I know already.
That conversation cast a shadow over the rest of my day. It’s the second relationship I’ve encountered this week, that has broken down because one party didn’t spend enough time with the other, due to work.
The lights dimmed, and the crowd started getting pumped up for the show. The actors start with their dialogue.
But there was a lot at stake here. Here are the facts of the case:
or better yet,
Wealth, to all intents and purposes was in the hands of the Malays albeit kept amongst the political elites. The banks, insurance companies, Petronas and all the major corporations seem to be in the hands of the Malays.
I have one other little thing to add to this set and they'll be on their way to the recipient today! Voila!
Announced recently on Twitter, The Warriors of God is a new project. Less than a week old in fact, and one that is dependent on a few things.
Patents indexed in Scirus include those from the United States Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO), the European Patent Office (EPO), the Japanese Patent Office (JPO) and the Patent Cooperation Treaty (PCT) of the World Intellectual Property Organization (WIPO) . By making patents available through its index, Scirus has expanded its service to include these new information sources.
I thought I did.
Bake in a 350° F oven until set, about 45 minutes. The center should still jiggle when gently shaken. Run a knife around the sides of the pan to loosen, and allow to cool, about 1 hour. Refrigerate uncovered cheesecake for several hours. Then, cover with plastic wrap and refrigerate overnight.
So, lets face it, the first 4 months were phenomenal. In January, we had some 2011 carryover money that produced momentum. February through April, we had extra funds come in from big jobs, we had off the charts Craigslist sales, and we scratched out what felt like a multitude of small little orcs that were nipping at our heals. After that we had a hefty HVAC that took longer than we expected, but still – somewhat manageable on momentum and hope alone.
We talked about focusing on a moment and adding details instead of writing 'dawn to dusk' stories that were, in my students' voices "BORING!!" (with thumbs down and a sad face!). We orally told some stories too, before I sent them back to give it a go. WOW, most turned out really good! I wish I took some photos!
When I think back to the day of the eviction, I says how did they get away with that? I look at Hitler and I think: oh God, how come there was no one to stand up and say no one could do that? But I know our kids and other people in 20 or 30 years’ time, they’re going to say how did England let that happen? That was the worst thing I’ve ever been through. The fear I had in my heart was something I’d never in my life felt. The morning of it I was running with my baby. I will never forget it. I think the police were an absolute disgrace.
Ginger paste:1 tbsp
Now, having said this, I have to confess that my latest mystery, The Stand In, violates most of these rules. There is no real central detective; instead, the readers themselves take on this role. This is because the story is actually a “smoke and mirrors” mirage – a special effect, if you will, something that Hollywood does so well – and Hollywood is the location of the novel, after all. What is the truth? What is really happening? It’s all there in front of your eyes, yet it seems like something else is happening altogether…. Some will figure it out right away, others must wait until the very last sentence in the book…which is last piece of that plate.
and while I"m online it appears I am targeted again for this pesky little Rogue virus inhabiting the internet world, that likes to disguise itself as XP Security 2012 Unregistered Version or XP Security 2012 Firewall Alert...who like to run this little 'scan' to intimidate telling you have security threats, when it is itself the actual virus...oh my word, twice in a two week period.
Let me remind you that the arts did not give rise to the economic chaos created during the Bush administration.
for free
Lick fruit from the serpent’s tongue,
There are many stories told of cross-culture, cross language marketing mistakes. Some, like the Chevrolet Nova car not selling in Spanish speaking countries because “nova” means “no go” are myths. “Nova” is a quite unpejorative Spanish word and, besides, something that didn’t work would be described as “no funciona”, and Parker Pen’s supposed translation of “It won’t stain your pocket or embarrass you” as “no manchará tu bolsillo, ni te embarazará”, which would have meant, “It won’t stain your pocket or make you pregnant”, was caught well before the advertisement went to press.
It’s a crisp, cold, & bitter wind circling around our heads.
I'd been told that it was a ten minute walk to the pub and it was definitely that. It was also, along Staplegrove Road which looked a bit of a rough area. Three very glamorously dressed females are going to draw attention and I saw quite a few guys looking at us but nobody said a word and nobody stared at me. I was so thrilled.
BYOBDown with the sicknessFeel good inc.Iron manSweet child of mineOneRun to the hillsBreaking the lawRaining bloodwalki cant get no satisfactionkilling in the name ofCrazy trainThe hauntingSelf esteemFreak on a leashVicariousSmells like teen spiritBefore I forgetDu hastBodiesRainbowAre you dead?Smoke on the water
Cancer is a horrible thing for anyone to have to endure. Everyone is affected, from the sick patient to her friends and family. No one really knows what the right thing is to do or to say when confronted with the illness. Author June Hunt decided to create her own guide for caregivers, based on her own experience as a cancer patient. In the first part of this book, she provides 50 ways that caregivers can help their loved one. Tips include sharing in the emotions, coordinating efforts for prayer and positive thinking, and helping around the house. Go on errands and bring special, meaningful gifts.
3 Garra
laziness is doom
Of course, I had that stuff back in about 1998, and apparently things have changed since then (I still think of the late 90’s as “recent," so I may be a wee bit out of touch).
The aged fox was gone.
So this past Saturday, I headed down to Austin to Tricia's place. We almost immediately headed out for the "expo". The expo was super small, but very efficient. Well, of course it was efficient, Teal & Beth were there volunteering and got us our packets, shirts, and bibs.
Hell; has been defeated. The grave will not hold, the king.
The Homestead company also has so many more products that are fantastic for everyone in the family. From diaper rash cream to eczema cream.
featuring a pointed collar, sleeveless styling
You and me babe, how about it?
Mass Effect 3 is a commercial work. Bioware’s success is dependent on the entertainment of its audience. Bioware has little right to claim artistic vision or integrity, especially since video game development is such a collective effort. Everyone has different artistic visions, and sometimes those visions have to be compromised for the betterment of the entire project.
And here’s a scary thought: if, by some miracle, the Demmerkrats get rid of Dodd before next year’s election, this hungry, ambitious snake will be climbing over the bodies of his children to snatch the nomination. And Connecticut being the foolish state that it is, he’d win.
- Personally I'm not the biggest fan of long drives, so I end up usually sleeping a lot in the van. Obviously getting to see our friends and play shows is the good part, the down time in between can be a bit rough sometimes.
Truth - When a man really tells the truth, the truth he tells is that he is himself a liar (p. 261).
The premise was challenged and disproved by his readers almost straight away. The back tire crosses the path of the front the same way no matter which way the bicycle is oriented. The only way to tell which way a bicycle was going by its tracks is to follow them to the bicycle.
1. Count your blessings
The white I used on the other three walls is Valspar's Du Jour (also in Olympic no VOC paint). It has slightly gray undertones, and I was happy to see that it still provides a bit of contrast against the white baseboards. I think it will look great with colorful art and furnishings.
the jeep, as will the doggone exhaust pipe that I will be forced to work
From Flatford Mill there are some marked and easy walks through Dedham Vale. On previous occasions the OH and I have walked to both Dedham Village and Manningtree – only a couple of miles apiece, following the river for most of the way. Obviously too far for MIL to walk, so instead we sat and soaked up the atmosphere.
What would be the point of God? Given the world that we live in and the vastness of what appears to us (at least for several light years) to be a largely empty universe with the odd star and planet. What is his point? Is he just showing off, “Look at me I can create the universe in its vast infinity.”
The Rea Valley is an unsullied place of gently undulating arable land, bounded to the west by the slopes of the Long Mountain and to the east by the Stiperstones and Shropshire Hills - a designated Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty. Small villages, Westbury, Worthen, Broxton, Aston Piggot and Aston Rogers and Marton are strung like beads on a necklace along the B road which winds its way along the valley bottom. To the west are Asterley, Pontesbury and Minsterley and perched on the hill, Snailbeach and Stiperstones - add to the mix numerous small hamlets and outlying farms. Stand anywhere and it would be hard not to be in awe of this splendid landscape.
- February 1974 visits Krishna’s birthplace in Vrindavan, India
I just couldn't and just can't tell her. I was a child then, and I repent my careless child's action. But telling my mother now, after all these years, would cause more hurt to her than unburdening myself of the truth would to me. So I shall keep silent and see the burden of that silence as the price I must pay for my childhood 'crime'.
A friend of mine challenged me to come up with some Elthos Vignettes which are examples of the kinds of people, places, things and events that exist in my World. So here is one of them, named "A Stone in the Forest".
I know you have heard a gigillion times before how great these are to make. Well that`s because they are. Here are a couple of my favourite blocks so far.
THE TALE OF JULIET by Jhet Torcelino-van Ruyven
My great old friend The Gap bag inspired today's outfit.
Marcel (and Maaike)
In Houston, the Harris County Commissioners Court and the City Council are missing a huge opportunity to collaborate on a new, independent crime lab, letting partisan and personal differences interfere with the best interests of the public. The city is moving forward with its own crime lab while the county just broke ground on a separate, new facility, the Houston Chronicle recently reported ("County breaks ground on forensics lab," April 11) with prospects for collaboration unlikely:
It’s a smart tactic by Erdogan this one: deny you’re up to anything where you have the right to be, as a distraction to the fact that you’re ploughing ahead in places where you don’t have a right in Hell to be. Thus there are now serious concerns among the Greek diplomatic community following an official announcement in the Turkish Government Gazette asking for tenders to explore areas in the Aegean Sea which are in the Exclusive Greek Economic Zone (EGEZ).
The resident continued the complaint and now the Sawmill has had to move, every last splinter I think, hence the new site that we have seen being built.
So instead of allowing myself to be like a racehorse (like I naturally want to be), I have to learn to be more like a plow horse that plods along at a slow and steady pace getting a job done but doing it much slower than a racehorse would like.
On that day.. Aiji tried to dress a bit gal as well - for the first time.
First, a 'card' by Aaryan for his favorite 'chachu' (my husband's younger brother):
-Exclude traditional interior solar vaults/atriums from FAR calculations (to a limit) where these encourage natural ventilation
A third tip that Jude gives us is to keep ourselves in the love of God. Now, what is this exactly? In John 15 Jesus tells His disciples ‘… the Father has loved me, so have I loved you. Abide in my live. If you keep my commandments, you will abide in my love…’ Jesus is highlighting the need for obedience. Now, why does God ask for our obedience when we’re struggling with trials in life?
“Whoo, go Max!” Dane cheered.
Here some pictures.
In one incident earlier this year, rocks were thrown through the front windows of his shop, one of which had the word “kill” written on it.
Apart from the fact that judicial precedent is the very cornerstone of deciding the balance or otherwise of the law in practice (frequently highlighting the sloppy incompetence of legislators) the truly disturbing thing about the PM’s pronouncement was that he could be argued to have a very clear interest in press ‘freedoms’ – that is, his close and at times inexcusable relationship with the senior management of Rupert Murdoch’s News International.
Step into Shadow Falls, a camp for teens with supernatural powers. Here friendship thrives, love takes you by surprise, and our hearts possess the greatest magic of all.
The 66th line
-combine all ingredients, spread in a 8x8 pan sprayed with non-stick spray
I petted the tender skin as softly as possible, and picked one stripe to kiss slowly along its length, across the crack of her ass to where it continued on the other cheek. “Damn, you’re beautiful,” I whispered, slipping a finger into her cunt, and finding her wet and ready, I hoisted myself over her lacerated ass and pushed my dick into her pussy from behind, moving slowly and gently inside her. It was like a dream when I came, but that one was all for my own pleasure, laced with a taste of sadistic joy that surprised me. I pulled out and reached around her ass and under her to rub her mound, her clit, her slick lips. She kept her face pressed into the pillow while I rubbed her, harder and rougher than I ever did, until her whimpers from the pillow and the motions of her cunt against my hand told me she was getting the orgasm she had coming to her. But on that day the orgasms—hers and mine both—meant less than the borders we’d crossed to get there.
Fredric Gabler, 30, New York, N.Y.
Well before this current back-to-the-land movement, John Seymour wrote The Complete Book of Self-Sufficiency in 1976, which over the years evolved into the current edition of The Self-Sufficient Life.
Yes acorns are brown
kill everyone in Afghanistan
thebloggerspost Authenticity in communication is key. Are you messaging just to say something or your actual message?
Two Muslim men who heard the shouting on May 30 said they thought a march was taking place and were afraid the situation would escalate, the court heard.
But I already feel tons better: more energetic and lighter and healthier. It’s a sad and cruel truth, I fear: that we really are better off, the less we eat. I’d probably be a whole lot safer in a city like Manchester or Tbilisi.
Adam got up with the kids about 8 and I went back to sleep. I just wasn't ready to face the world. We had to be out for lunch at 1pm so could afford a slow start to the day. I suggested that seeing as the kids would be dressed nicely for lunch that perhaps we could swing past Santa and see if we could convince the kids to get a pic with the big man.
Isometric exercises developed a level of popularity, thanks chiefly to Charles Atlas. Some people worked out with Indian clubs, barbells, and medicine balls. Diet gimmicks, colonics, and other gimmicks also had their adherents. “Taking exercise” and sleeping in the open air were seen as very important, since non-circulating air was regarded as a breeding ground for disease. Many houses featured “sleeping porches,” which afforded residents not only access to that open air, but some degree of relief from the heat in those horrific days before air conditioning.
Lucy Hale is the February 2011 Covergirl for Teen Vogue! The Pretty Little Liars star dishes to the magazine about how she originally wanted to be a singer, her obsession with Taylor Swift’s music, and the show!
Of course, that feeling is fleeting when your kids prefer taking in the view from terra firma. I took this shot during the balloon ride with my three daughters. My middle daughter loved it. I'm pretty sure I traumatized the other two by dragging them on this ride. My youngest sat on the floor of the basket pretty terrified. I had visions of them on a therapy couch recounting this part of the trip. The rest of our adventure was pretty tame in comparison. The horseback riding, rafting and hiking had more universal appeal to my group. Well, except for the paragliding. Middle girl and I loved that too. My oldest and youngest daughter decided to stay grounded and watch us from below. Thank god for smooth landings. A message to therapists in their future: Maybe you won't be remodeling your kitchen on my dime after all:)
He turns around and yells curse words in my face, spit flying from his lips. A drop lands on my cheek and I brush it off. “You’re disgusting”, I say with bookwormish dignity. “Fucking nerd”, he screams back. Snatching the book from my hands, he starts ripping out pages.
1½ teaspoons pure Mexican vanilla extract
“I love man dates!”
Mystery Fest features my own Bubba Coletrane and the Trainwrecks funkin' it up on the 2 day bill. I'm thinking that will be enough to push this past ACL Fest as Pollstars festival of the year. Hope to see everyone there.
Billy Ray Cyrus ... Daniel Burton
I looked around and searching for new inspiration,
We’ve seen that Return On Engagement is a social computing metric you can use to measure how you’re doing with your own community. And that’s great. But no matter how well you’re doing, you must remember that your community members spend 99.99 percent of their time on other Websites.
So, Ted vomits when he's pissed at me. Any time he is in timeout or meltdown mode, he gags himself (no hands, he can do it with just his friggin' epiglottis, I guess) to the point of vomiting bile. Ever have a kid in a hold and you yourself gag on the smell of his bile? Mmm...no wonder Autism is the Cool Diagnosis this year!
-Divide the spinach between two dinner plates and set aside.
Whose hands point to heavenly joys on the dial of eternity” (Clark, Christian Endeavor, supra, p. 316).
And this is not something that I am making up. This is not something that Tim Geithner is making up. We’re not out here trying to use this as a means of doing all these really tough political things. I’d rather be talking about stuff that everybody welcomes — like new programs or the NFL season getting resolved. Unfortunately, this is what’s on our plate. It’s before us right now. And we’ve got to deal with it.
Their simple beautifulness is strong and lively compared with luxurious silk and elaborate dye that upper-classed people were fond of.
The scenery is great in this film, the dialogue is sharp, funny, poignant. But most of all, most of all, it’s the scenes with Coco and Arthur. I’m a romantic, I know, but there aren’t alot of romantic movies that I find can really sweep me away. This one did.
It is gigantically problematic in my opinion to prioritize the feelings of people posting prejudiced material over the feelings of people who’ve already been slapped with someone else’s prejudice, just for the sake of keeping the peace. If our peace is bought by allowing sufficiently-civilized bigotry to go unchallenged because it might hurt a prejudiced person’s precious delicate feelings to be told in no uncertain terms to straighten up their act, I’m not sure it’s worth the price.
“I want parents to know it’s a possibility their kids are doing this … I want them to talk to their kids about the way they do about safe sex or drugs.
I get that Catholicism has its own non biblical views on contraception and reproduction but that is not the belief of all Christians. However, some aspects of this idea are gaining notoriety in the current political platforms. For instance, an Arizona female politician has proposed the House Bill 2625 that allows employers the right to request access to medical treatment records if a woman is using her insurance to pay for her birth control. The employer is able to deny contraceptive medical coverage, which goes against his/her religious views, if the use is only to prevent pregnancy. Hello! the purpose Margaret Sanger intended for the pill was to PREVENT pregnancy to any sexually active married and single women. That means PREVENTATIVE PREGNANCIES for any woman who does not want a child or another child. The misconception is that only single promiscuous women need birth control. WRONG!!!!
Catalyst: Liz dumps Shaun.
Several proposals catering to the Domestic Oil and Gas business were submitted to the Government for its evaluation and approval regarding KG-D6‘s revised field development plan for D26, CY-D6 ‘S appraisal program in February 2012, CBM’s gas pricing formulae and its discoveries D32 and D40 at NEC- 25.
Now following the pictures, sorry for the TMI, Bubba started having rear end problems. Needless to say no amount of protection has helped his raw hiney. So after a couple of bad diapers I put him in the bath tub for the second time tonight. Only this time Sissy was awake from her nap and decided to spectate. She asked what was wrong with Bubba and I said "Bubba has a case of baboon butt." To which her response was "Awe, poor Bubba. I kiss Bubba's butt." Ah yes...something to black male her with in the future!
From what I have heard from my parents and from what I have gathered on my own, I was pretty close to not being part of this world anymore when I was in the hospital for that month a couple years ago. I was so out of it and not lucid the majority of the time, so I know for a fact that it was not me keeping me here. It was God and I am certain of that. When you have been that close to death, the first second that I got to truly live was the best moment of my life. How can I not celebrate life when I have so many angels around me! The biggest angel being my grandfather, who I know is definitely watching over me. From what I've been through, I have learned that when you want to do something, do it. When you want to go somewhere, go. When you want to change your life to become a better person, don't wait. And especially, when you want to tell someone you love them, do not hesitate. If I could go back and change the past couple of years, I would not. Everything happens for a reason. We are all put on this Earth for a purpose, but we will not all be here forever. Celebrate life every day and be thankful for absolutely everything. It will change your life :)
However, as for life being an illusion, both that man and the bird may be the same.
- Paul Fassa, How to Detox Fluoride from Your Body
Chic right?
No surprises right? When you come from an immigrant community where defrauding Canada's refugee system was the main ticket into the country, why stop there? We've already proven ourselves to be a nation of suckers so you might as well take advantage of it.
We would like you to volunteer to go before a South African court and show how Tongo is lying. We believe that this would help the public understand the following questions:
How does one talk about love? Is it even possible to describe something at once utterly mundane and wholly transcendent, that has the power to consume our lives completely, while making us feel part of something infinitely larger than ourselves? Taking a unique approach to this age-old problem, the nameless narrator of David Levithan’s The Lover’s Dictionary constructs the story of a relationship as a dictionary. Through these sharp entries, he provides an intimate window into the great events and quotidian trifles of coupledom, giving us an indelible and deeply moving portrait of love in our time.
Orlane Anagenèse 25+ First Time-Fighting Care Eye Contour
The father of the late Michael Jackson has packed up his Jackson Perfumes business because he was unhappy with the treatment he received from officials at the Fashion Show shopping centre.
On top of all of that, despite the sizable dose of fast-paced action that was injected into the second half of the book, the strong potential for suspense & excitement was shot to hell by way too much predictability & unbelievable convenience. Whenever the heroine was in any kind of trouble or was faced with an obstacle, a solution manifested itself almost immediately right out of thin air. And the solution was often implausible to the point of being absurd.
You can probably guess from the first image that I chose the left hand column!
Failure shouldn’t be viewed as always bad. Henry Ford said: “Failure is only the opportunity to begin again more intelligently.” He added that he wouldn’t hire anyone who has never failed. Thomas Huxley, the English biologist, concurred: “There is the greatest practical beneﬁt in making a few failures early in life.”
Currently, Dundurn Street has two auto lanes northbound and one auto lane southbound. When the new bike lanes are installed, this configuration will be modified to one auto lane in each direction with separate bike lanes in each direction.
I watch as she walks into the building and back into her normal life. I'm glad we parted on good terms and I feel like we will return to our normal online seduction and maybe sometime in the future we will meet up on some neutral ground and share a couple of days of passion again.
Most monograms at weddings include the groom’s first name initial, the couple’s new last name initial, and the bride’s first name initial. Monograms don’t have to be initials but frankly, it’s the most common version I’ve seen and that is what I was thinking about when I posed my question. The thing is, Mr. Scottish’s first name starts with a vowel. And while some first names starting with vowels look nice, A, and E for examples, his name starts with an “I” and well, that’s just confusing! People mistake it for a lowercase “L” all the time and imagine it in a monogram and some people thinking it’s just a line of decoration instead of an actual letter. Plus, adding a vowel can turn your monogram into an actual word and that word could be weird or inappropriate. Such is not the case with ours, but our letters CAN make a word and that defeats the purpose if people look at your monogram and read a word instead of your lovely names.
riding on the tractor,
Spindler’s Search (40) – Destroyed all Lairs
I noticed that the Mirabel pencil skirt is also on sale, for around $79.99 I think? And that peasant blouse? Also rocks in the green color!
Love will save the Day
In this report, UN experts put the US-led “rendition programme” in context as another sad chapter in the history of torture and secret detention, alongside the 1970s campaigns of disappearances in Latin America, and the gulags of the USSR. And in case of any doubt, the UN sets out in unequivocal terms exactly why such practices are illegal.
The kriek started off as a Flanders Red, which I brewed in Brooklyn with Ray in August of 2008. I kegged it before we moved to Portland, and even served some before deciding that it was just a little too lackluster and needed some extra souring. I still had about 4 gallons of beer, which I topped off with a little Belgian Dark Strong and some of the new Flanders red brewed with Al B's bug blend. I added a bunch of fresh cherries and some oak chips almost 3 months ago, and I am finally happy with the flavor.
Powered by a liquid cooled four stroke DOHC single cylinder engine, this Japanese off-road bike could give out 26 hp at 8500 rpm. While these were not the biggest numbers, they were enough to put quite a lot of pep into the 205 pound chassis of the AX 250. This Honda off-roader came with disk brakes for both the front 90/100 19-inch and rear 120/90 16-inch tyres; great for controlled speeding over uneven terrain. The transmission system comprised of 13 front sprocket units coupled with 41 rear sprocket units. For even better control, riders had a 6 speed chain transmission gear box that could take the Honda AX 250 all the way to a top speed of about 85 to 90 mph.
***NOTE***All aplicants must be willing to fill out a 1099. You will be employed as an independent contractor and responsible for your own taxes, healthcare, etc.
In the end, I went with emotion. It's easy to obsess over the intricacies of whiskey and tasting notes, especially when you write about it, but above all, it should be about enjoyment. I tried to think about what I would miss the most with my heart, not my head. The answer for me was peat. I love my bourbon and rye, but the thought of never sipping on another Lagavulin, never feeling the smoky exhale after a sip of Laphroaig, never getting the wisps of smoke on a more gently peated Talisker, Highland Park or Brora was too much for me. And so, Scotch it is. Goodbye sweet bourbon and rye.
Before I read A Return to Love, I regarded myself as spiritual and open-minded. My mother had asked me a few months ago the all important question of whether I believed in an unconditionally loving omniscient Divine Intelligence. My answer was that I did…
Fuck that shit, I'm not shelling out that much money for the game, USED! If it was New, I'd probably bend over and take it, but not USED! Looking around, i eventually find a few places that sell it for reasonable prices... except most are freaking sold out. Then i finally find the first two games for 19.99 on gamestop and sigh in relief, and bookmark the page. I decided to put off buying them until the next day cause... well i was feeling lazy. The next day? Website said they were unavailable.
My newest and most favorite show, Detroit 187. I can't say enough about this show. You MUST check it out. Tuesday, 9:00 on ABC. I've heard rumors that it might not be renewed, but I'm hoping they are false!
Those in favour of child leashes argue that they offer a measure of protection for a child who may decide to bolt into traffic, or a safe option for a willful toddler who refuses to hold mommy's hand. They report they're also a great alternative to popular-but-isolating baby containment devices such as strollers or wagons, allowing the child to be a part of the world and getting excercise instead of passively watching the world go by from his little wheeled bubble.
We can have healthy debate over some of the questionable events all
140g plain flour
at the following limits:
Thank you one and all for sharing these past four years.
6. Let it simmer at low temperature for about 40 minutes. Check to see when it is ready, and add a few spoonfuls of water if necessary. Serve very hot, fresh off the fire.
Streets of London, Ralph McTell.
So even now I mourn
Something was terribly wrong. I felt I was beginning to lose my son — that these outbursts were changing his very nature. The teacher and school social worker tried to downplay it, to the point of almost mocking me for my concern. But I knew my son. I knew this wasn’t him. And I knew I had to find out what was happening in his class that was having such a dramatic impact on him.
Pulp publishers Street and Smith advertised Doc Savage as a “SUPERMAN!” but in house they were referring to the Shadow and other mystery men as “superheroes” as early as 1932. Future DC publisher Harry Donnefeld launched Super-Detective magazine in 1934, but the prefix had been popular for at least a decade. Bruce Graeme opens his 1925 novel Blackshirt with a complaint: “A super-criminal—bah! It is all tommy-rot, this ‘super’ business.
Whisk the egg into the milk and add to mix. Stir all up and put in cake tin.
Tonkatsu sauce:
Okay, so let's try to summarize here. I think you have the roots of a good query here. You clearly have the writing chops, and I can tell, after sifting through my confusion, that you've got a vibrant and entertaining world here, but your main problem is too much detail, and too many named characters, so much so that everything else gets buried.
But on the way back I cuddled with Jack
Finally, dogs need a healthy relationship with their “pack”. Dogs will position themselves in your “pack”. This means they must have some obedience training to ensure that they understand general commands and how they are expected to behave. After this is established, your dog will feel safe and secure, this also allows for a psychological and physically healthy dog. After this, they will require human bonding and closeness.
Marc & I joked that on Sunday, we'll put an announcement in the church bulletin: "Nice, normal couple in the 3rd row needs friends. Meet us at the coffee cart after service." I know, I know--"you have to be friendly to make friends." Yes, true. But friendly is hard. Sometimes you just want someone to notice you are new and make an effort. And I move so much...honestly, I'm tired of always being the one to make the first effort in friendship.
quote from the bill linked directly above:
What would you stop doing?
Draft number four came out of my blood, sweat, and tears and went down to two pages. Only two pages. Down from eight. If my math is correct, that is a 75% reduction.
There has been a drastic change in the sex ratio since 2001 in Andhra pradesh and this year census shows a good improvement in the sex ratio.My only wish is that such change should be seen all over India and wish a day should come when the ratio is 1000:1000.
There are no bears in America.
We were at the Oakley Pub when I poured out this pale hazy lemon with some light white head. Everything about this beer is light, which is kind of what you want in a summer beer. Light spice, light color, light body, light smell. Really not much to point out other than that. There are plenty of better options when it comes to summer beers. I don't care much for wheat styled beers so I need to really be hit with a lot of flavor.
It was also exciting to know that the community college where I now work was honored with a “Simon Spotlight Award” at the Friday plenary. It was a great way to conclude the conference.
A few stops later, we ended up at Humayan’s Tomb. Again, a group of Indian guys, probably in their early 20’s, wanted to take a picture of us. We laughed and agreed again, and they snapped away.
* 2 large organic pears (any)
For MMM12 day 5, I wore the dress I have been working on all week, and finally finished. It was sort of experimental. I wanted to make something with the “Pink” theme for this week’s Sew Weekly challenge… but I had very little pink fabric. Looking around at what I have, I found some cute Lisette popsicle print fabric, and a pink H&M top that I got on sale for 3 bucks, and that I have been meaning to remake into something because it fit badly.
So, without further ado, these would be the best things about mankind slowly being killed off and replaced by reanimated corpses;
I think it must be a control thing. If I take the photo, if I pull the silly face, or choose the weird frock, that's up to me. I make the decision to publish it. It is an interesting phenomenon, the fact that lots of bloggers admit to anxieties about how they look, they don't think they are the most beautiful women in the world, but they obviously gain confidence from publicly saying, "this is me, and I look pretty good!" And this is irrespective of size, age, style, or the cost of their clothes. I like this about blogging, it's open to all.
Please feel free to share any of your ideas!
UMNO and some deep-seated NGO leaders are too quick to demean those who bring to facade the above notion – erroneously implying that any attempt to honestly decipher the semantic of the Constitution is to question UMNO and undermine what they term as ‘the unity foundations they have long built’. Too many political observers, this is too opinionated in temperament.
I support him. Roy, you’re a lad. One problem with the appointment is that one really big candidate has been overlooked. Yes, Harry Redknapp. Not really, though, he’d have been awful, and instated as manager on the back of a press love-in. But no, it’s quite surprisingly: me. Yep, I’ve not got any “actual” experience to speak of, but I won the Champions League three years running with Weymouth once (thanks Football Manager 2007). In addition, I said I’d be willing to do it for whatever you’re willing to pay way back in February: even a packet of Maynard’s wine gums would suffice, since I’d quite like it.
Yes, in the 17th and 18th Centuries the British Empire was at the evil heart of slavery in the triangular trade along with the Spanish and Portuguese. However from the start of the 19th century, arguably to today Britain’s zeal in abolishing the slave trade is one of our finest hours. The two reasons the European countries went to West Africa was there was an existing slave trade between west and east Africa, managed by Africans and Arabs. Also when you look at your “Virginia” tobacco it was a crop that grew very well on the east coast of America, which the demand for slaves began.
I have been a busy, busy girl playing with all my new products and I am here to share a bit of that with you today. Have you noticed how big clouds are in papercrafting right now? Keeping with the times...Close to my Heart now offers the most darling cloud paper in our new Splendor My Reflections Paper Pack. Check out all these great creations I was able to make with just one paper pack and a few of our new accessories.
If only I had more clothes.
Grand Valley State University economist Hari Singh found that if Michigan had been a right-to-work state, the auto industry would have seen a 25 percent gain in jobs since 1965. Instead, it lost 56.6 percent just between 2002 and 2009, shrinking its work force by 165,777. In a functioning market, high unemployment would lead to lower wages. But in Michigan’s auto industry, Singh found, wages actually rose 18.1 percent during that time.
I tried it and got a familiar sinking feeling. It was indeed bland and pathetic, like my every other attempt to impress my husband's family with my kitchen skills. Thwarted again! A curse!
Did you taste any unique cake types/flavors at your tastings? What flavor(s) are you hoping to select/did you select?
One who is desirous of obtaining prosperity should do all that results in blessedness. They who live amidst fragrant odours themselves become fragrant in consequence. They, on the other hand, who live in the midst of foul stench themselves become foul. One devoted to the practice of ascetic penances is soon cleansed of all one’s sins.
4.) Last of its name still operating.
I know The Thing in theatres right now is purported to be a prequel and not a remake. I call it a premake. It’s taking the bare bones of the first remake (yes, it’s a remake, I’ll get to that later, I’m sure), adding a few new characters, and follows through to the end, but it has a higher budget and what some people believe are “better effects.”
Attainability: YES? PLEASE?
Some refer to Steampunk as "Victorian Science Fiction." Others have expanded upon that definition. Hear a lively exchange of ideas on what some believe Steampunk is, and is not.
Another day, another great MCG trade
BM: So that’s an invitation to Athene to pop round for a cup of coffee with us and one of Lucy’s famous raspberry and cream shortbreads. She can prop her spear in my umbrella stand.
We gave satsumas away for people to take home. We exchanged gifts, but didn't open them, as not everyone had one or brought one. One of the other teachers brought sugar cookie dough and the makings to decorate them, so we baked and decorated after we ate. Most of us were too full to eat them, so they took those cookies home, too.
It's the Most Wonderful Time of the Year!
Twirly goodness! I realized after I saw all the colours in daylight that the pattern's "turquoise" is actually more of a green, but whatever. It all goes!
Floridians are going to have to start pulling up their pants and stop having sex with animals soon.
His return to the small screen is significant because it is a part of a growing trend. An increasing number of movie stars have begun signing on for dramas in recent years. For example, similar mega-star Jung Woo-sung starred in 2011′s “Athena: Goddess of War” after 14 years of successful movie work.
Yes, I know that was a small percent of people doing the bad deeds, but people look for the bad and the not the good sadly. To defend the city a little, there were a ton of people down there in the city who came out with families to enjoy the cheering and taking pictures with the riot police, who were happy for that. Those fans were the best sports, cheering, excited, and happy for their team. These are who I like to see when a team wins a title.
He tries all fourteen of those on offer, just a sip each, or two. The Grenache is different from the straight Mourvèdre, hell he can discern that much. Different from the GSM. From the Shiraz, the Cabernet. The words to describe this? Doesn't have any. After six wines and breakfast a long time ago, he is already getting a bit warm in the cheeks. He tries to spit some out into the funny looking thing that he hopes is a spittoon, on the bar.
So here is my creation:
Rod Stewart- You Wear it Well
don't you think they look kinda like a green eye ball with the pea in the centre?? erm, the character 'Mike' from Monsters, Inc? think i can bake them for halloween as well, haha!!
Decide which silhouette you want to go with, then enlarge by hand or on the photocopier.
Wow. One word. How difficult… every month this year could have easily been a different word! A different piece every month that somehow never made a whole.
Daddy had Memorial Day off and E was done with school as well, so we decided to head North three hours and hit the beach for the day with some Friends (Lake Michigan, in case you were wondering what "beach" is located North).
I love my life. I appreciate the trials and tribulations that I have experienced. I am learning from those “opportunities”.
Mathews County, Virginia (population 8,978): Melinda Moran, manager of the Town of Clarksville for the past 18 years, has been appointed Mathews County Administrator, effective April 16, according to the Gloucester-Mathews Gazette-Journal. The announcement was made following a procedural vote at a special meeting Saturday afternoon by the Mathews County Board of Supervisors. Moran will replace Steve Whiteway, who retired on Jan. 31 after serving more than 11 years in that post. Moran began her tenure as manager of the Town of Clarksville in May of 1994. According to a release from the county board, during Moran’s time in the lakeside Virginia town, she “led administrative efforts to establish a lasting shift from a traditional agricultural and manufacturing-based economy to tourism and service-based economy.” Moran holds a bachelor’s degree in human resources and a master’s in urban affairs and planning from Virginia Tech. As the new county administrator, Moran will earn $90,000 a year. Clarksville, the first incorporated town in Mecklenburg County, is located on Virginia’s southern border. With a population of 1,139, according to 2010 U.S. census figures, Clarksville is situated on Kerr Lake. Each July, the town hosts the Virginia Lake Festival, attracting approximately 80,000 visitors during the three-day event. The search for a replacement for Whiteway began last summer, attracting a “substantial number of candidates,” Burns said. Several of those candidates were called back for follow-up interviews.
Paper- Early Espresso, Very Vanilla, scraps from my DP bag
Television is a dream come true for an authoritarian society: those with the most money own most of what people see; fear-based television programming makes people more afraid and distrustful of one another, which is good for the ruling elite who depend on a “divide and conquer” strategy; TV isolates people so they are not joining together to create resistance to authorities; and regardless of the programming, TV viewers’ brainwaves slow down, transforming them closer to a hypnotic state that makes it difficult to think critically. While playing a video games is not as zombifying as passively viewing TV, such games have become for many boys and young men their only experience of potency, and this “virtual potency” is certainly no threat to the ruling elite.
And, in my case, they love to tell me about my high blood pressure. I have always had high blood pressure. It is the silent killer and, frankly, I am going to be very annoyed when it finally gets me. Until then, like my late Mother who lived to age 98 and also had high blood pressure, I am not going to worry about it. I maintain a moderate diet and even exercise daily on a treadmill.
The base of the table was actually a little bit more "in line" with what my client wanted, but the top of it wasn't. I ended up doing about 2.5 opaque layers on the top, and just 1 on the bottom.
The very hinds discerned it, in a star.
Marc Jacobs Watches – Buying Guide
Starting a blog at the dawn of something is very hard for me. Ever since I was little, I have had this compulsive need to appear as though I know exactly what I'm doing. I never wanted to appear as a know-it-all. Just someone who had it all together. Someone people could turn to for advice. I still battle a very deep fear of not wanting to appear silly or make a fool of myself.
With this, I solemnly say, "I love you."
A silent night
It’s been suggested I’ve always been 45. Even when I was 6 I would sit in with the adults and voice my opinions about the world or the topic under discussion. And I was always much happier with kids being in the role of dad or granddad rather than classmate.
I was at a dance intensive, with classes taught by the masters, casting auditions, and of course, a giant finale show at the end. This program was by audition (they only select 50 people from the US and Canada) so it was quite intense.
Or do they? I was pretty excited tonight (and a little perplexed, as well) to hear my mother-in-law speaking on the phone in Mandarin. "So you DO speak Mandarin, " I kidded her once she got off the phone. I knew it all along, but this was the first time I actually HEARD her. (I mean, she grew up in China, so how could she NOT speak at least SOME Mandarin?) Granted, she obviously did quite a bit of word searching and spoke slower than in Cantonese (again obvious if even I heard the difference), but she can speak it well enough to carry on a conversation. So, now, if she'll only converse a little more with the grandchildren . . . Perhaps I'll put it to her another way: Who do you think speaks better Mandarin, me or you? We ALL know the answer to that one!
WIRRAL’S only BNP candidate says he “no longer has time for Nazism” after photographs emerged of him performing the infamous Heil Hitler salute.
1 Tbsp Louisiana hot sauce
Fate sets Robert's life on a new course.
In an earlier post I put up a poem I had written for my maternal grandmother, so today I decided to put up a poem I wrote for my other (paternal) grandmother. So, here it is:
Hi Lovelies!
In order to reach all those readers who are unaware that they are dying to read your story, the writer also needs a platform, which requires a well thought out strategy, brand and design. This includes promotional material (bookmarks, buisiness cards etc.), website, social media and, of course, the books.
my own
Please feel free to print and share this flyer with others!!!
As her sobs began to slowly subside, she noticed that he was softly stroking her hair and whispering, “Shhh… it’s alright” into her dark curls. It had felt like a long time since she’d felt so taken care of. “Oh,” she murmured, as she pulled away from him. “I’ve gotten your shirt so terribly wet. I’m sorry…”
We also did a little yard work and I spray painted a bit :)
Faithless lie,
The place had stood quite happily for over seven hundred years (it was already old when the checkerboard façade was added) when some dickwad of a Victorian decided to suck up to the mayor by adding a clock tower in his honour.
Nom-nom. But this is not where the Easter surprises ended. I was planning to do chocolate mousse filled chocolate egg-shells for Easter as well, when my husband beat me to it and made his signature dark-chocolate, caramel-crunch, scrumptious mousse!
"Mom, I don't speak English. I speak dog."
I tell you the weather in Sweden is a bit strange at the moment, either the sun is beaming from a clear blue sky and I´m certain spring has arrived or the fog is so tight I can´t see three metres in front of me ;) So a bit hard to photograph them in a satfisfiying way. But this is as good as it gets :)
I hope everyone had an excellent Halloween!
The answer is simple. The existence of time before the Big Bang can be discussed theoretically but never proven. The theoretical point called the “Indeterminate Point” is a point that can NEVER conclusively be proven physically. It can be discussed hypothetically, but it cannot be proven to exist. Consequently, one cannot conclusively prove the existence of other photons (three dots shown above) that are theoretically beyond the Big Bang. Therefore, the entire notion of an epoch beyond the Big Bang collapses.
He responded, "No, there is a method to my madness here".
And rhyming elaborately,
Ready? Break!
So I had a dream last night that we were walking through the company and some female soldier made a comment to him that made me suspicious. Her name was Gonzalez (just a dream, so I have no qualms about putting up the name), so I checked his Yahoo! Messenger, which I have since set to archive all his conversations and not told him I have done so. …and there it was, I didn’t read, but rather scanned it and he said something about it being more kinky than normal but never told her to stop. What a way to wake up!
Pour mixture onto a floured board and knead until tight and glossy. It should be difficult to mix, to a point where no more flour will stay into mixture. Form into a ball and let it sit, covered, for 1/2 – 1 hour.
This week the Design Team are showcasing Bo Bunny and/or Basic Grey products. If you have either of these two products, we would love to see them in your projects this week but if not, please come and join us anyway !!
As this sounds like an excellently themed celebration we wanted to join in. And I had a plan about how we could ...
With the dramatic extensions to unemployment insurance implemented by the Obama Democrats, the private sector is now paying people not to work:
Oh you know what I'm talking about. They're the juices with side effects like bodyquakes, a constant glazed expression as you plan a 300 page book in your head and a perma-smile.
YOU need to read, research, consider, and then plan for whatever eventuality YOU think is coming, if indeed any trouble is coming.
First of all, meet Rosie! She's a lab that someone dropped off at the office a couple of months ago. Dad's workers named her, and she is the sweetest little ol' thing! Seriously, she's one of the most kind, friendly dogs I've ever seen. I love her so much that I tried to take her home with me. After a few nights of hearing her cry, I brought her back to the office. She just loves it here, so she's now our Girdley Flying Service/Girdley Brothers Farm dog. Look at her sweet face.....
They see each other growing older, and they’re learning not to hope.
Then there are those who truly are blood bought, born again believers but are reluctant to leave this world for they are having too much fun, or so they say. This reminds me of one of the companions of the apostle Paul, Demas by name, who is mentioned in 2 Timothy 4:10. “Demas hath forsaken me, having loved this present world.”
It actually understates the case, because the original $800 billion of the stimulus plan was spent in fiscal 2009, meaning Obama and the progressives spent it but the deficit gets added to Bush's total because the original budget was proposed, past and signed during his presidency (standard procedure). But when you add in the stimulus, the amount below of $4.99 trillion that Obama added to the deficit is closer to $5.8 trillion.
ANYWAY---
But you know what? My blog won’t fall apart if it has a typo. At least my voice is being heard. There’s nothing wrong with being a dreamer, especially a dreamer with a plan. Yes, I’m out of shape; but with every step – walked or run – I’m getting stronger. I’m not perfect, but I have a lot to offer.
Instead of focussing regarding fact claims, contract your measure to protect everybody added in this online gamey from any affect the cause may real compartment be mortal fitted.
As a part of this project, Eva announced that she wanted to volunteer at our local humane society. I have a friend who works there, so one afternoon last week while Ian was in his earth science and band classes at the middle school, we drove out and took the tour. One of the things they need volunteers to do is to simply play with the animals, keeping them happy and socialized. We spent about a half hour covered in a litter of kittens. They jumped and tugged and pawed and were generally adorable, and I’m not even a cat person. We met other animals too – HIV cats, puppy mill rescue dogs, animals that came with various injuries and disease. There’s a lot of love to be given around there.
half of a lime
This was the cabinet where I used to keep tea and doggie biscuits for Chloe and lots of glasses.
The Legislature in 1872, Huff said, investigated then-Gov. Franklin Moses Jr. and he was indicted for stealing. Moses then surrounded the governor's mansion with troops to avoid arrest, he said.
Is there a plus side? Erm.... Well. This is difficult. I did see Alan Fletcher sing to a Freshers week crowd. Although this should be in the against argument the combination of numerous bottles of VB and Tooheys New, being neither a Fresher nor a student and seeing Dr Karl himself was a heady mix.
All HDSB board meetings are open to the public, and are held in the board room of the JW Singleton Centre at 2050 Guelph Line (just north of Upper Middle) in Burlington.
Over the ground I walk
When I was born and lived in Cork I was from Cork and that was simple. When I briefly lived in Birmingham I was the Irish boy and kids at school asked me if I was in the IRA, or knew anyone in the IRA. I was seven, so I probably said I did. And when I lived in Tanzania I suffered the odd Irish joke from my Australian friends, but I could laugh those off because I recognised them as re-badged Kerryman jokes that Irish people had written in the first place. Coming back to Ireland after three years abroad was the hardest adjustment of all because of the Antipodean mishmash of an accent I'd picked up and the fact I didn't own a polyester Ireland shirt or a sega Megadrive made me more of a foreigner than ever.
"The only commandment with a promise is to 'honor our fathers and mothers,' and the promise is 'so that it may be well with you, and that you may live long on the earth…' (see Ephesians 6:2). Nowhere does it say we should only honor great fathers and mothers or even good ones, but simply the ones we have been given, good or bad. Almost all will be both good and bad, just as some of the greatest heroes in the Bible also made some of the greatest mistakes" --Rick Joyner
"It is not what they have done, it's the way they did it. It feels like we've been cut off at the knees," he said.
Chapter 9
Present Day:
Dear Wulong Tea,
The scenery behind the bench completes the stage set. Two foliage clad houses, with arms of thick ivy stretching across the road, slowly turning the mineral vegetable.
"If you wish to grow thinner, diminish your dinner." -Henry Sambrooke Leigh
Why is this quiche easy? Because I cheated and used a prepared pie dough. I know, I know, but I was in a hurry and needed a quick and easy lunch for the week. Plus, it turned out very tasty, so i’m not complaining.
Kirby called. He is still employed, but 600 other Blizzard folk are not, as of the 29th, and his shift "yesterday" started late Wednesday night, which is when they found out who stayed and who would leave with a quite-decent severance gift, but sudden unemployment. High security measures during and after the layoffs. Kirby's nearest involvement was telling his team members which should go to one room, and which should go to a different room. Eleven of his team of twenty-some was let go. He said he had survivor's guilt. He was glad to have his job, and he likes it, but the mood was dark, and security was heavy.
of these wicked persons
Once we have regained the use of our legs, realised that day is night and night is day, and established that the locals can’t pronounce the letter ‘e’, what else would we do other than pile everything and everyone back into a plane, which in my humble opinion is as healthy a thing to do as lick the anus of a leper, and fly to another city. Not just any city, but a city recently flattened by a massive earthquake. Where we will spend 3 days presumably sightseeing sights that no longer exist. With a toddler.
haha. I think it’s cute and make perfect sense.
Your triglyceride levels should be under 150 ml/dL in order to be in the normal range. Anything over 150 puts you at a higher risk for heart disease.
“Of all the habits and dispositions which lead to political prosperity, religion and morality are indispensable supports. In vain would that man claim the tribute of patriotism who should labor to subvert these great pillars.” — George Washington
And the thing that makes me mad,
I should be looking for work and housing instead of writing. I should be trying to work out instead of writing. I should be eating instead of writing. I should be doing anything instead of writing.
In her own words: Note From Lapland is where I write about whatever the hell is on my mind, whether that’s Finnish supermarkets selling vibrators or more serious posts about dealing with life after children and discovering who you are but hopefully always in an entertaining manner. I swear, I rant and rave, I make you laugh and hopefully also make you think.
The blue and red towel was found at a flea market. I can't wait to find more and completely cover my sofa with pillows!
No, let me keep it. My hands go to my stomach protecting it.
Expect more posts like this soon - I'm overhauling my online portfolio and will be archiving a lot of my older artwork here on the blog. Oh, and again, please do not use any of this artwork without permission - I worked really hard on it and I'm just posting it here in great detail for people to look at and enjoy, not so you to turn it into t-shirts or whatever. Of course you already knew you weren't supposed to use ANYONES artwork without permission - but a friendly reminder never hurts, right? Thanks.
The armored car robbery plays out like a straight rip off of the much more exciting finale in The Italian Job. Matt Dillon's detective investigating the robbery is divorced and having trouble being a good father to his daughter, just like Al Pacino's character in Heat. At the scene of the initial robbery, Jake comments on the technical proficiency of the robbers and their use of shaped charges and C4... wait for it... just as Pacino does in Heat. The lines sound almost exactly the same. The opening bank robbery is eerily similar to the Heat's famous bank robbery, even down to the guns the characters use, their outfits and the stuff they say.
Woman should contrive to look so wise, so that her "random" stupidity was a real gift for men.
I’ve been here a year now and I’d have to think on what my biggest confession would be. I think the fact I don’t like my job would be it. I am good at it, and I am loyal to a damn fault to where I now begin my mornings with a stomach ache from the stress of dealing with the oncoming day. It’s stressful. and the boss of me is now saying after the conversion I am to run the desk with 1 person. WTF?! Are you kidding me?! I’m JUST NOW getting to a point where I am attempting to have a life outside the hotel and now you are going to take that away from me? HELL NO.
Talk to me - anyone else out there feeling the same!?
2cups Flour
Unless it can be settled swiftly, the case of Chen Guangcheng threatens to overshadow the annual meeting between leaders of the world’s two largest economies on key issues ranging from North Korea’s rocket launch to Syria.
We've also discontinued the Electronic Publishing page, and folded much of its content into the Small Press page. When we first put the Electronic Publishing page online over a decade ago, epublishing and print publishing were parallel universes, but those differences have eroded--over the past couple of years especially--and we no longer see a need for a separate page on epublishing.
Ref:
I made this for my sister who is undergoing chemo right now. She hasn't lost all her hair by any means. I think it's serving more as a lose hair catcher and just to lift up her spirits. I was so excited to give it to her that I forgot to take pictures, so I recently had my niece bring it over to model it for me. Unfortunately, it was so cold, that she had a hard time posing without looking like she was freezing to death. You can even see individual little snowflakes in her hair.
“No movies, I just told you why we can’t turn on the TV. Why would a movie be any better?”
“You will know later.”
The D.O.J.’s newly approved scoring policy now only requires potential police officers to get a 58% and a 63%.
"Of all the bodies I investigated, none were stabbed less than 40 times. In the latest case in February, the woman was stabbed 72 times. They then leave the body on the road where it can be discovered soon. When the police arrive, they search the body and find the piece of paper with the contact details.
Many of those who purchased the hunting permits said they would simply frame the historic documents as keepsakes. Others said they wanted to “be legal” in case a wolf leaped from between the floorboards of their homes and attacked their families. One man told National Public Radio “I simply don’t like wolves, and I wanted to send them a message.”
X. X-Rays you’ve had: Lots and lots of my teeth.
Day 12 down! Not many more to go!
There’s nothing like taking a walk after a rainstorm…and what a doozy it was! The heaviest part of the storm hit yesterday here in Orange County, CA. We haven’t experienced buckets of rain like that in a long while. But we sure needed it! And today when I woke up, the sky was this bright blue with puffy clouds scattered about – beautiful!
Which leads me to think the bigger question might be, what will Islamist rule look like in Egypt?
Too often organizations exist to push paper and send emails to protect the back side of bureaucrats. Unfortunately bureaucrats are focused on the organizational chart, titles and how to move up the ladder. Leaders exist to make a difference in the lives of individuals. And sometimes the leader is not even aware of his / her contribution to the organization or to the lives of the individuals that are touched by the leader.
Of course, the girls were wishing for another little girl and everyone is still kind of in shock, especially Kim. Kim's hubby, Eric, knew from the beginning that they were having a boy and we were hoping but our main desire is for a healthy baby. The fabric I got in Kauai will go up on my design wall today and I'll be search through my stash for more blue & brown prints. Thankfully, I made a blue and brown quilt last year for a dear friends grandson. Today hubby and I are going to garage sales in hopes of picking up baby boy clothes. All the guys in the family are so incredibly pumped at this news; it is just so fun!
Slice the squid across, into little rings,drop them all in a medium pot of boiling water, bring to boil...do not boil for more than about 1 or 2 minutes, or it will get rubbery!
I don't think I can blog about Orlando.
Garlic (again, I put something like 3 cloves? Clearly you won't need this much)
But once the ARCs go out, all bets are off.*
Sinn Fein later said it was part of normal party policy to rotate staff.
“When Jasmina was born, Fernie gave her a whole wardrobe she had made of velvets, laces and satins.”
This past Saturday, celebs rubbed elbows with White House power players and media pros at the White House Correspondents’ Dinner. What does this mean for us regular people? We get to see Kim Kardashian and Lindsay Lohan at the White House…I thought both of their looks missed the mark, almost as if they tried a little too hard. Click on their names to judge for yourself. Below are a few of my favorite looks of the evening.
SA hospitals "becoming places of death"
“Eric, wait!” she called when he was halfway to his car.
- Crochet hook E4 / 3.5 mm
We arrived in early May, for a week, and our cordial host has a fire going in the living room fireplace. Flowers on the table. Bottle of wine and glasses waiting. We immediately were comfortable and felt at home.
So when we created the master bedroom from 2 bedrooms, I thought we’d have a football field of room to house these badboys. Not so much. In fact the lowboy just ate up the entire midsection of the room. I started thinking about smaller dressers, then I remembered my lingerie addiction and my 147 tanktops. So I sucked it up and continued to bang my leg every morning on the corner of the dresser. Every morning.
with the adress of your friend and a small text, wish or greeting (not more than 20 words), which I can print on a nice tag. Please don't forget to write your name (the sender). I do not need to know your reason to send the give-away, it will not be a contest for the most pityfull story, hi, hi.
They also talked about translation of foreign books, which is huge in France. They were throwing lots of numbers around, but what stuck with me was that 16% of all works translated in the world come into France, versus 3% in the states, making them the biggest "importer" of translations. Also, publishing is apparently the number one cultural industry in France, making 3 times as much as the film industry, and 25% of their profits are made on the international market. (Hmm, perhaps I should do another masters in metiers du livre ?)
1. I am originally from Long Beach, California. I especially miss CA now when Virginia has the "mix-it" winter weather. Mix it with a little freezing cold at the beginning of the week, may be some snow flurries at the end of the week...
All this work, but it was really done just to see the old tooling treated well and back in use. There is no place on Carteach's bench for this press, but I'm certain I'll run into someone who needs a good turret press at a great price, and then the Old Lyman will be once again cranking out quality ammunition.
Gravel roads aren’t that bad if you are the first one in line driving down one, unfortunately everyone left the reservation about the same time so the road on the way back was like clouds of white fog, dust permeating everything – heaven help the lungs of the poor guy we saw in a convertible.
She was allergic to the anesthesia she’d been given. She was left alone, asphyxiated and went into cardiac arrest. She had been suffocating for five minutes before anyone realized there was a problem. Our mother was brain dead.
wave modulation. Three types of GM ‘sweep’ schemes are
Having entirely too much fun for someone getting paid for what he's doing, Dan Aykroyd can't quite keep a straight face as delivers the line, "You never studied." It makes for a vibrant scene that always makes me smile. Ghostbusters
“For two thousand years Central Asia was the womb of terror, where an implacable queue of barbarian races waited to impel one another in history. Whatever spurred their grim waves – the deepening erosion of their pasturelands or their seasons of fleeting unity – they bore the stamp of phantom mobility and mercilessness.
New God and Tunnel of Love later appeared on the debut LP Come On Down.
Currently, 50,000 women a year choose to leave the space for the father’s name on a birth certificate blank.
Paul Corrie – Well, of course, the dream project is one without a budget…any designer can tell you that! That was more of a joke…budget or no budget, a dream project is one in which the client expresses their goals and wishes, and then listens to and takes the advice of the designer / professional. This is a profession where so much faith and trust is put into an individual that may or may not have something tangible to show them. The ability to be a good designer, however, isn’t in a piece of paper and can’t necessarily be taught, and so a great deal of understanding design and one’s ability can be as simple as this…Some people have it and some people don’t.
Much attention is given to the idea that mankind’s industrial development is destroying Bigfoot’s habitat, making it more difficult for the creature to survive. It may even become extinct, Schritter and others fear.
The resultant federation of individually sovereign states worked splendidly for nearly 100 years, as unfettered and productive sovereign citizens were empowered to flourish in a relatively safe free-trade zone with sound money. Admittedly, the basic nature of our government began unraveling with the Civil War, and was effectively eviscerated by the Progressive atrocities committed in 1913, our darkest year (Amendments 16 & 17, and the Federal Reserve Act). Still, thoughtful students of our true history cannot be faulted for pining for a return of the halcyon days of our nation’s youth, when individual opportunity trumped collective victimhood for industrious citizens. Only the numbed minds of the easily deluded could consider the pernicious slide back into serfdom offered by the collectivists, as anything even approaching “progress.”
The traffic is at its peak as usual. But the cold weather has miraculously calmed down the hot tempers the motorists usually subject themselves to. There is smile everywhere. The relief is in the air as the Bangaloreans bite into the the tempting looking ice-cream cups or sip the smoking hot cups of coffee while exchanging familiar nudge-nudge wink-wink glances at one another.
Before I continue I need to explain what my working week involves.
I have two posts that talk about ebook pricing and the value we place on our work. This is a conversation that is running all over because of things like Agency pricing and the 99 cent ebook. It’s something that’s important to me personally because not only am I an avid reader who spends a lot of money on books, but my debut will be released as an ebook. I think we all love a good bargain, but many times, I’ve looked at 99 cent books and although they were worth the money, they weren’t worth my time. I’m more likely to spend a little more on trusted authors or based on a recommendation. Chuck Wendig talks about ebook pricing. And then Jenny Hansen talks about the value of a story.
No-one wants to be out of step (except me), so advertising is a great way to get people to conform.
Referral Level 1: 5
I wouldn’t be behind in school work, I wouldn’t have gone on countless road trips, spent nights in hotels, worried for hours whether or not he wanted me, I wouldn’t have lost a friend, I wouldn’t have to think about any of this everydamn day of my life.
Marion explained, between huffing and puffing, that she too was running on the path but was overcome with an asthma attack. She started towards her car when she realized she lost her keys. She had to backtrack to find them. She then started to panic because she was alone, couldn't breath, she was the furthest point away from he car, and was in a spot where no one could see her if she passed out. She was happy to see me with her keys but did not know who I was. Besides the balaclava, the tighter running shirt and pants and my muscular physique must have thrown her off. When she discovered it was someone she knew she was embarrassed.
I met Don on the flight from Atlanta to LA. He told me about his fabulous projects, including the upcoming reality show on OWN, Beverly’s Full House, featuring the supermodel Beverly Johnson. I told him about my blog, and then quickly realized he would probably never read it, and took a nap.
Happy New Year to you all.
Yeah, I know – not a creative title for my first blog. Well, ya gotta start somewhere. In this blog, I don’t yet have a theme – so for a while, and maybe always, I will be weaving together random thoughts. On life, on being Southern. On worship. On being female in an uncertain world. On whatever in the world strikes me as relevant to write about.
Arnold
I am lucky enough to work in a fluffy storefront, and besides the "which diaper do you recommend" the most asked question we get is "What all do I NEED to start"
But wait it gets better; we’ve got a sitting President of the United States behaving in a manner not seen since the paranoia of Richard Nixon and his infamous enemies list - Wall Street Journal: The President Has a List
Have you figured out yet that the country hasn't suddenly bought into your way of thinking? That maybe 2008 was more anti-Republican/anti-Bush than pro-anything-you believe? The country doesn't want the federal government to solve all of our woes.
Sentiment Stamp by Cat's Life Press
Stay and fight, she implored me. Face the enemy and remember our cause.
A woman walking her dog on a street which dead-ends into a retention pond saw a person a few yards from the wooded area.
Even though spending time with Him may cost me sleep, time with my kids, comfort or even popularity...I must choose to maintain this precious relationship between me and my Lord. I must choose, at times, to let everything else go and just sit in His Presence! Nothing compares, NOTHING!
Fish-loving part-owner Pat Glynn bought Seabass as a foal after seeing an advert in the Irish Field. He spent four years looking after the son of Turtle Island before sending him to Ted Walsh. After taking a close second on his debut in a point-to-point at Belharbour in February,
San Fransisco/Los Angeles based four-piece Siddhartha know how to restart your ears on a Tuesday morning, drum beats everywhere that practically force you to get up, indie riffs and vocals howling at you telling you it could be worse so deal with it. The band are signed to Neurotic Yell Records, fitting when you see what’s written about them on the label’s website. Apparently vocalist Marlon Hauser was in the midst of some existential crisis in 2009 when he met the other band members, maybe he’s still in the middle of said crisis, whatever is going on inside his head the noises he and his fellow band mates are producing have, according to NYR, coined a new genre, Dashiki Shoegaze. Yeah, what the fuck is that? Well something like this “an all-encompassing live musical transformative experience”, if you think you can handle it, here’s their label’s page about them. Admittedly they do seem like a band to be seen live, transformative or otherwise.
Mountain Safety Council chair Ross Meder added: “Tourists often fail to realise weather conditions can change extremely quickly in New Zealand, much more so than in the Northern Hemisphere.”
The address I had for Cavan Genealogy was First Floor, Farnham Street, Cavan. My daughter easily found the town and the street. We drove along the street slowly and looked, unsuccessfully, for a sign to help us find the right location. Then we saw a large blue & white “i” for information painted on the side of a large building. She pulled over and parked and I walked up the hill to the building. It turned out to be a department store with shoppers buying clothes. I found the customer service desk and spoke to a gentleman there. He kindly explained that the tourist information, down the street, was no longer there. He asked where I was going and said I wanted the library, just down the hill. We moved the car down the block to the library’s car park.
And the process of getting to know
1 T allspice
“Aerogrammes.” Newcomer Hari hates Renaissance Gardens where his family dumped him but he has no options while waiting for a son who never seems to visit him until he meets demented May.
“I’ve actually been posting daily drawings for over four years,” he says. “I didn’t start drawing every day to do a 365 project though. All through my childhood I was always drawing. It never really slowed down until I graduated from art school and started working at design. After a couple years of this I realized just how little was I drawing and it kind of freaked me out. I was worried if I continued down this road I would lose that outlet. I was determined to make it part of my life again. Two years later, I was on my own working as an independent illustrator because of my daily drawings. It’s pretty incredible actually. I am self-publishing a book of the first thousand. ”
What are some situations that make you sad, or anxious?
everything waited
The Constitution has been amended seventeen times (for a total of 28 amendments) The first ten amendments are known as the Bill of Rights. The current 28 Amendments are meant to modify the Constitution with concepts which allow the Constitution to be relavant to the current society within America.
Then there are the union sets. A perfect place for brettanomyces to hide with all that wood and piping.Even if the pitching yeast contained no brettanomyces, there's a good chance a Pale Ale would have picked it up from the unions.
16. Take Me To The River
I wanted to reply to each and everyone of you, but I kept running into snags, many of you are "No Reply" bloggers. Have you heard of that before? When your comments come to me through my email address, I can easily respond and keep the conversation going, which is great - especially since you know me - I'm a chatty girl! Many times however, when I hit "reply" up in the address bar where your email address would normally appear, it simply says "No Reply" (insert sad face here)... so I can't write back to you. Don't know if you're a "No Reply" blogger? I didn't know myself until I followed the steps I'm about to share with you. Rather than reinvent the wheel, I'm sharing a link to Karen's blog, Sew Many Ways. Click here to see if you're a no reply blogger, and if so, she'll tell ya how to change that if you're so inclined.
This tour will be so much more than a blast, as Andrew Klavan is really making a name for himself in YA. Some of his adult novels have already been turned into movies, a couple you may have heard about starring Britney Murphy in Don’t Say a Word and Clint Eastwood in True Crime. Andrew’s previous YA series, The Homelanders, has now been optioned for movie rights by Summit Entertainment. Crazy Dangerous is his first stand-alone YA. So I’d like to have this tour work more like a street team, and for all of us to Tweet and use our social media to point readers to websites, Facebook pages, and other announcements during the release. If you’re curious to know more about the exciting things happening for Crazy Dangerous, please check out the catalogue page here.
Anyway, what did I think of Towers of Midnight?
Ryan and I also celebrated our 12th wedding anniversary this past week. Last year we ate take out together on a grimy picnic table in front of the hospital. This year we did the happy dance we weren't in the hospital, (although I did take William to the clinic and the rest of the boys to the dentist that day) and then we headed to they gym where we put the kids in child care and after a treadmill workout, relaxed in the hot tub, sans children! Sometimes it's nice to just celebrate things by slowing down the pace.
One of the biggest challenges in making CAS cards is that it can be a tad boring...Do you find any "wow" factor for this card? This is definitely not the most creative design, but I decided to share it anyway. The instant gratification from your feedback and kind comments keep me posting and posting... ( can you see me smiling?)
The arrival of the farmer's market always excites me - perhaps a bit too much. I tend to overbuy. I mean, there are only two of us and yet I bring home bags full of fresh produce. But who can resist fresh produce at its peak? And after all, I'm supporting local farms, right?
I really do wish Alain de Botton luck with his project. And who knows? Maybe when the centre opens, if it does open, in 2013, I'll pay it a visit. If only to find out what it's like. In the meantime, my piece of advice to Mr de Botton is to put the stereo on and allow Ms Simone's opening verses to unleash the spiritual power within him: Birds flying high you know how I feel/Sun in the sky you know how I feel/Breeze driftin' on by you know how I feel/It's a new dawn/It's a new day/It's a new life/For me/And I'm feeling good. I'm already down on my knees, my hands are placed together and my fingers laced. Alain, I am worshipping at my own temple.
You need to
Day 10: If you have Rainbows or older children do they know and remember your angel(s)?
My daughter's pride a few weeks ago when she first stood up was and is still very obvious. She squeals each time she does it, still, and expects a round of applause.
No one goes from one job to the next yakking about everything they did, saw, wrote and learned at the last one. You just assimilate it all into your own personal database.
Note: I was given a Telestrations game for my family.
In 2010, “Exile on Main St.” was re-released with a couple of previously unused tracks from the original sessions. After all these years, the strength of the writing and performances from 1972 still stands out as one of the high points in their long catalogue. “Exile” has unfortunately also reminded us that the Mick Jagger who wrote great songs has been a missing person for so long that it is time to officially announce his passing. Mick had a lot of big sales through the years, but his biggest was making people believe he was just a singer in a famous rock n’ roll band. It was a pleasure doing business with you Mr. Jagger. I won’t forget to put roses on your grave.
Today was Wednesday, and therefore, it was a shorter day than usual. On Wednesdays we are supposed to have a tutorial time during second hour. But guess what I have second hour? Band. So guess what we didn’t get? That’s right. Tutorial time.
How many nevers you have in your life
Later, when I left work, my Prince sing-along hit full tilt in the car on the way to pick up The Geej. Selections from "Purple Rain" were joined by classics from "1999," "Parade," and other albums of his. However, when I got to the Geej's aftercare place, the iPod was turned off, and the concert came to an end.
Shop at onestopplus and avail their $10 of on your first order! Plus, $2.99 on every order! For other information you may visit the site right now!
Another thing the wind provided was a fantastic, ever-changing, cloud show. The play of light and dark on the sand and on the water was hypnotic. I could have watched it all day except, of course, that I had visitors to talk to and birds to look for. One visitor from Germany wanted to know the name of Charadrius melodus in German. He wasn't familiar with the piping plover and didn't recognize the Latin name. I told him I only know the common name in English and French. It's a North American species, so maybe it doesn't have a common name in German. Something for me to Google in my spare time, I guess.
The lack of attention I had given to my gardening had allowed the boundary between path and wall to become a little overgrown - defined by the increasingly strong growth of wild things. The less attention we give to our own edges, boundaries and borders the more difficult it will be for us to break free of them.
It's been doing a lot of work lately. Sometimes I wish my mind came with an "off" switch. I guess even though have electrical impulses, it doesn't come with a breaker box. :)
It’s also worth noting that diets have changed dramatically in the last 30 years.
France and the Bongos of Gabon
But I didn't because on one of our daily outings - last Thursday - he led me into the woods at Overton Park on his own. And then Sunday he surprised me again.
Which is fun.
We're afraid
See the Catch-22? So do I, and it sucks. In a way I’m glad I can contribute a small drop of paint on a blank canvas of teen paranormal fiction, and I hope it leads to more diversity in the genre. Race is not the main issue in my story, but to say that it doesn’t matter is a pacifying, politically correct lie. One of the first rules of writing is to write about who/what you know. If everyone around you looks and acts exactly the same, step out of your comfort zone and strive to know more.
This is not the only place where this expression from Psalm 110 is quoted in the Christian Greek Scriptures. This passage from the Hebrew Scriptures is the one most often quoted in Christian Scripture. So we can examine a number of its appearances to correctly establish just how it was used and to what arguments it was applied as support. The Watchtower interpretation that “sitting” meant “waiting” is required by their chronology-based belief that Jesus could not begin his reign until 1914, as discussed above. But it is quite clear from many other passages that the early Christians did not understand the passage to mean that. They understood the phrase “sitting at God’s right hand” to mean that Jesus was already ruling as king. One very clear example of this is Paul’s citation of Psalm 110 in his first letter to the Corinthians while discussing the resurrection. Paul actually substitutes the term “rule as king” for “sit at God’s right hand” in the source from which he quotes:
26. Transparent
CHARACTER
On the NCAA side of things, Stanford is still the favorite as they cruised to conference and regional wins both times led by individual winner Chris Derrick. Oklahoma State should contend still as German Fernandez seems to round into shape after an early season injury. They ran regional as a team tempo run with all the team coming across together. Colby Lowe is still the key I think as he needs to step up from last years performance. If he does they will be right there in contention with Stanford.
If so – then here is my heart. And if you’re more apt to using a Nintendo/Playstation/XBOX controller – I say ready player one. Your game is awaiting.
Search: snow garden pictures
exact some mental
We are so pleased to welcome Deedee's Digis as our sponsor this week!!! Deedee's Digis offers a variety of adorable digi images, many of which are Christ based, as well as scripture sets. One of you lucky ladies will win a $10 voucher to spend in Deedee's Digis store for playing in this week's challenge!
Open up the top of the model and round out the bottom as far as possible.
Mix everything in a bowl for the filling.Make a small ball and keep aside.
and at the mere suggestion,
if we talk about its looks its different from previous ace,the new ace 2 looks to have more curves than its predecessor .
Another class of experts whose prominence is largely a function of serviceability to power is former radicals who have come to “see the light.” The motives that cause these individuals to switch gods, from Stalin (or Mao) to Reagan and free enterprise, is varied, but for the establishment media the reason for the change is simply that the ex-radicals have finally seen the error of their ways. In a country whose citizenry values acknowledgement of sin and repentance, the turncoats are an important class of repentant sinners. It is interesting to observe how the former sinners, whose previous work was of little interest or an object of ridicule to the mass media, are suddenly elevated to prominence and become authentic experts. We may recall how, during the McCarthy era, defectors and ex-Communists vied with one another in tales of the imminence of a Soviet invasion and other lurid stories. They found that news coverage was a function of their trimming their accounts to the prevailing demand. The steady flow of ex-radicals from marginality to media attention shows that we are witnessing a durable method of providing experts who will say what the establishment wants said.
BB8 – 3.9 million (average)
Why do we incarcerate Arab terrorists who have murdered or intended to murder Jews, rather than executing them, as the Torah law prescribes?
-Great packaging (thumbs up for pump dispenser)
“My last month has been filled with great regrets and remorse. My comments were disrespectful and inappropriate, and I am very sorry for making those comments. I have accepted the NUS Board of Discipline’s decision. I just want to say again that I am deeply sorry. Please accept my sincere and heartfelt apologies.”
Source: USGS
It seems Ferrari chose to make the car as soft on its rear tyres as possible; as the original expectation was that the Pirelli rear tyres would degrade more rapidly. Certainly Ferrari have been easy on their tyres, but the flipside of this characteristic is that the car can struggle to get heat into the tyres. This is why their pace at Barcelona on the hard tyre was so poor and why they struggle to get the pace on a single flying lap qualifying run.
“Thank you?” he said, looking at me with a crooked smile.
It poured with a big seductive glug and in my haste to get stuck into it I got a little bit of the yeast sediment into the glass which meant that it was a little bit hazy but was still a vivid amber colour. A quick smell revealed a fresh, vibrant, resinous aroma of tangerine, mango and chewy fruit salad. It smelled fantastic.
I shrugged. “I thought it would add a whimsical touch.” My smile was all innocence. “Notice I made them flats instead of heels like mine. And I didn’t give you red toenail polish.” I broke the prolonged silence by adding, “You know, you did say you wanted your outfit to look just like mine except for--”
Anyway, in regards to the book, I liked it. The story was very heavy, but the characters were nicely developed. I read this several years ago, but did not remember the story being so interesting. Basically, Dream (Sandman) gets the key to Hell, because Lucifer doesn't want it any more. Then a bunch of characters from various mythologies show up and want to make a deal so Hell can be theirs.
Then there's what I look for when I buy clothes-their function, if you will. I like my clothes comfortable. I want to be able to go for a hike, clean the kitchen, do a few yoga moves, and then sit on the floor and play with my dog. Athletic gear, I'm sure you can imagine, is a staple part of my wardrobe. I could wear sparkly sequined yoga pants, but I don't. For me, the perfect blend of simple (taste) and comfortable (function) is a pair of black yoga pants.
There were significant disruptions to travel resulting in an almost six hour journey with several changes of train. My journey from London to my home station is scheduled to take just under 90 minutes, so you will appreciate the distress and discomfort I experienced.
to form the scalloped pale pink border on which I placed the lace and then stuck
2 cups heavy whipping cream
It doesn't look quite as good in person. (Oh, how can I be such a picky little bitch?)
On making the business more financially viable:
“Mike Allison had been involved in a collision with local Arts and Culture MEC Weziwe Thusi’s police convoy. The accident happened at such a high speed, his son Mark says his father didn’t stand a chance.
Additionally: I'd like to add that, after some thinking - and the fact that One Size Fits All earned over a 100 - that there should be an elite club of sorts for albums that are so damn good their scores, with the "factors" intact, are over 100. This shall be called the 100 Plus Club. I can already tell you it will include all of the artists on this list...and others.
Motherships, as you have already seen in China and Moscow film footage,
You know what? They get paid and they have a loan that says that they’re going to make solar panels, and then who is going to buy the solar panels? Themselves.
Dane DeHaan is the centre of the story, as the bullied and abused teen Andrew. The one who embraces his powers the most; he’s also the most damaged and is the one who ultimately has to face his demons. For all the darkness in the character, he also manages to show the joy of a teenager finding friends and a meaning to his life. Alex Russell plays Matt, cousin to Andrew and someone who’s pulled away from the social circles of school. Ostracising himself he is trying to find a human connection, but thanks to isolation he has trouble. Finally Michael B Jordan plays Steve, the all star of the group. Over achiever, looking to get into politics, social butterfly, his life has purpose, but with the power he finally is given something that gives him a great sense of joy. Fun without worry, freedom with limits. All three represent a perfect trio, and the actors are believable. Every step of the way I was with them, feeling every emotional turn.
____
Kayla stood there for a couple minutes, digesting everything she had heard.
"Ruth Bader Ginsberg," I said proudly! oh, oh and Clarence Thomas...
Evvie saves a village boy from drowning and reveals herself to the outside world. Then taken under the wing of the village healing woman, she is able to live an almost normal life--until her sixteenth birthday, when a dark mage murders her friend.
P.S. (By the way, right after I wrote yesterday's post, I went by Sam's Club and saw no less than THREE people buying flat screen tvs! Guess they must be a tad more reasonable these days...I haven't priced them in awhile, lol!)
“I was on the left side behind the three-point line and they passed me the ball,” Dompierre says smiling as he recounts the game. “I heard the fans, including my mom crying.”
*doesn't apply to poncey floppy-haired liberal 'comedians' making indiscreet jokes about granddaughter-shagging, obviously. That was an outrage!
Congratulations Ladies - your Top Three badge is ready and waiting for you in the side bar.
I glance down at the holdall which sits on the bench beside me, and then I close my eyes and inhale deeply.
City Hall has brought in a private firm to analyze the cemetery to see if there’s anything else that can be done to bring in more revenue.
The following series is a theory, only. I can not prove that this is true, but I can say that much of my theory can be proven via historical documentation.
joys
Seriously, I want help understanding the thought process or theology behind this guy's message. We only keep non-fiction here in at Chateau Squatlo, or else I'd look it up in a Bible for myself. Since we don't own one I have to depend on the kindness of strangers... like Blanche Dubois, but with less lipstick.
“Draw me away! We will run after You. The king has brought me into His chambers. We will be glad and rejoice in you. We will remember your love more than wine. Rightly do they love you.”
We checked out Casa Botin, that oldest running restaurant in the world, but there was a long line that Easter Sunday. No problem. The same foodie friends D and J introduced us to another Hemingway favorite haunt. Restaurante Salvador does not serve Botin’s suckling pig (besides, we had our cochinillo fix in Segovia) but it certainly serves the best Rabo de Toro. My friends said this is the same place where matadors hang out after a corrida. And one of them matadors had an affair with no less than Ava Gardner. Whether it was after or during her marriage to Frank Sinatra is debatable. But who cares if one is served bull’s tails for dinner?
My wife and I did a little fishing Tuesday evening and ended up catching 8 fish altogether. My 5 kids didn’t fish, but they were nearby throwing things in the water and making way too much noise. Here is my take on what one of the fish my wife caught was probably thinking before, during, and after being caught.
We flew out of Sydney on Saturday and tried to squeeze in as many opportunities as we could to say goodbye before we left. The outpouring of goodwill from our friends and family really overwhelmed and surprised us a little. Thank you.
1 sobering
When she comes to, Helen finds herself in Anne Marie's apartment. Helen is in her bathroom, covered in blood, and Anne Marie can be heard screaming and wailing in another room. After checking to see if the blood is her own, Helen leaves the bathroom.
OSHA statistics show BP ran up 760 “egregious, willful” safety violations, while Sunoco and Conoco-Phillips each had eight, Citgo had two and Exxon had one comparable citation.
1998 – Shakespeare in Love
They are just like the common people who do not think it their duty to God and the world, when they have bright sons, to put them to school and have them study; but everyone thinks he has free power to raise his son as he pleases, no matter what God’s word and ordinance are. Nay, the councilmen in the cities and almost all the rulers act in the same way, and let the schools go to nothing, as though they had no responsibility for them, and had an indulgence besides. No one remembers that God earnestly commands, and will have it so, that bright children shall be raised to His praise and for His work, which cannot be done without the schools. On the contrary everyone is in a hurry to have his children making a living, as though God and Christendom needed no pastors, preachers, carers for souls, and the worldly rulers no chancellors, counselors, or secretaries. But of this another time. The pen must remain empress, or God will show us something else.
I love playing Warmachine, but when it comes to collecting, I’m several expansions and dozens of models behind. It occurred to me the other day that I essentially stopped collecting around Superiority. I don’t own cavalry, plastic ‘jacks, Harkevich, or the upgrade kits. I don’t even own a Behemoth. Let’s face it, miniatures are expensive. I don’t often buy miniatures simply because I can’t afford to. I’ve made some lucky trades, which is how I acquired the battlegroup up there – the result of trading a bunch of old Warhammer bitz and figures and two Magic the Gathering dual lands. I think the last miniature I actually bought was Zerkova, sometime last fall.
Spin like a record, crazy on a Sunday night
My day was cut short due to my excuse for the wedding of my uncle in Bulacan. It was planned and it was ironic that the wedding coincides with the last day of the Big day. But I was expected and my clan expects me to be there plus they assigned me as one of the groom’s men. The feeling of an incoming reunion looms and I also feel excited for I haven’t seen them in ages. I left Batangas just before Vespers end and the bus ride to Pasay took ages. I was like a dead man walking, and I was asleep before I even realize that I am in my sister’s guest room. I awoke the next morning to my mother’s voice and my nephew’s cat purring on my chest. I took a heavy breakfast, got dressed and headed to Intramuros with my family for the wedding. The ceremony went on smoothly. It was peculiar that on this wedding I felt happy for the couple, maybe I have matured and known what they are undergoing or maybe because this is our lesson with Fr. Ogie in Sacraments or maybe because I could picture myself in the altar.
So, since I'll be learning about organizational behavior tonight and not sipping on a Guinness I'll just have to relive some of March 2007.
so in preparation for i what i promise will be a forgotten Fourth of July weekend
Those on the right hand of the Lord, the sheep, have the characteristics of those who will be favored by the Lord. Those on the left hand, the goats, have the characteristics of those who will be told to depart. So, if someone is harassing you, say, “Look, I know you’re just trying to get my goat, so I’m going to let you have it, but you are not going to be happy with it. I’m one of God’s sheep. He calls and I know His voice. Let’s leave that old goat to wander out in the wilderness like the scapegoat, and I can introduce you to my Shepherd. We can be in the flock today, and we’ll be like victorious war-horses one day.”
Khostov’s laugh was mirthless. “Does it really matter?”
QuaysTV News broadcasts live in full HD from the UoS ‘The Egg” @ 130pm every Wednesday.
Which leads me to my next gripe. Health Insurance/Medical Cover. Having been cossetted by the National Health Service in the UK, not perfect I know but has always done me very well, I now find myself needing private health cover as an expat. Trying to compare the Bronze, Silver, Gold or Platinum levels (or whatever equivalent title they’re given) with USA cover or without, with evacuation or without, with or without dental … I don’t even know how to begin to decide. But that’s not my real issue. My real issue is with the brilliance on the part of all these environmentally friendly companies who no longer need to send a brochure. Simply email the pdf and some poor sucker at the other end has to either print the whole thing out or spend half a day sifting through the pages that are actually needed in order to make an informed decision.
So you say ‘hi’ and exaggerate how great it is to see everyone out here tonight. (“Ye-ah!”)
And so on, and so on...
“Yeah. I guess it’s just something I can’t do.”
One of the pillars of the United States model of government is that of checks and balances. Each of the three branches of government has discrete, clear powers that complement and control the powers of the other branches. (Well…ideally, anyway.) Given the many attacks on individual rights pursued by far-right legislatures citizen groups — especially directed at women and other minorities — the role of the courts to restrict that over-reach is critical to a functioning democracy.
Highlights – Decent fight. The one who’s father died a few weeks back got the win on the decision. For me he easily won both rounds. The slightly annoying tickle fights next week.
First, prepare the lamb heart. Cut off any vessels, valves, tubes and the like. Trim away excess fat (that would be the white bits on the outside). Basically, you want get it down to that meaty-looking maroon part of the lamb heart, which you then slice into strips.
HP: Who has had the biggest influence on you in terms of your writing career?
Then carefully start rolling the dough from the longer side. Pinch the edges once you reach the end to seal it in.
Distaste for the service that Steinberg promoted was widespread. Writing on her blog The Fertility Advocate, Pamela Madsen, founder of the American Fertility Association, said: “Some things do need to have some sacred space around it. And the creation of life and the end of life is one of those things that deserves sacred space.”
Cambridge police have confirmed the death of Matthew Stuart, who helped his brother cover up the fatal shooting of his brother’s pregnant wife in 1989.But of course Matthew and Charles didn't cover up the killing; it was reported instantly, by Charles Stuart himself, in a 911 call. They conspired and lied, but what they "covered up" was the evidence, not the shooting.
After we were done practicing, I went up to the second violin section leader and told him that I was flattered to be in the first section but I was not really THAT good of a player. He just looked at me and told me that I would do fine and not to worry about it and that the first chair player would help me if I needed it. They were not going to put me back in my section, I guessed. After that, I figured I was going to have to actually PRACTICE my music from now on, and got music to practice.
Personally, I'm very surprised this cover has good reviews -- It's stiff, ugly, oddly shaped, the fabric snags easily, and it has a horrible plastic smell. Do you want to know what I really think about it? *wink* It's leaked every time I've used it because the leg openings have a very strange shape. I've considered trying some prefolds with this cover to see if that helps. But I will certainly never buy another Prorap!
Despite the fact that I owe the dang government money...
One sound you can make is by closing the back of your throat and making a kind of quick but light growling sound. Most French and German speakers use this but traditionally people from Northumberland and Durham did too. Another is by rolling the tongue against the roof of your mouth. Variants of that can be found in Scotland and Italy or in the French Pyrenees.
I’ve lived want
So, to make a long story short……………..I have spent nearly 30 years raising my family, trying with very limited success to build friendships since it is very hard to find people who don’t have their closed circle of friends established, and gritting my teeth at the hundreds of “rudities” that are very apparent to everyone except the 99.9% of people who grew up here.
Table (or common) beers throughout the colonial period were low in alcohol and lightly hopped. Called Small Beers, they served as a form of nourishment and at the same time made the water used in preparing the beer "safe" for drinking. Recipes were often corrupted, based upon what the settlers had available for brewing. molasses and other fermentables frequently substituted for malt.
it is just a set of rules and equations.
Score for me.
I used a Cocoa Mouse stamp, Egg-cited Cocoa and coloured him with my promarkers. The dp is Basic Grey digi paper and I added some ribbon, layered mulberry flowers, and flat pearls. I think Cocoa looks so sweet popping out of this Easter egg!!
Yes, I know it's completely surprising that I visited the Fluevog store.
My mantle is finished...finally. I was able to hang Christmas stockings, and "deck the halls"...or mantle rather, in all kinds of holiday festiveness. I know, I know, I should have posted pics of the blessed event, but my house was still in total and complete disarray...which brings me to the why I'm posting today.
I’m still on the fence as to whether or not I should completely write this off. If you were this excited only to be put off by a financial structure, would you walk away? Or do you still give it a chance and steer clear of the in-game shop?
That might have been so, but Roberts was not among that group. In her initial article on the case—the one in which she asserted that “something happened” to Mangum, and “reported court documents” contained evidence of a “hate crime,” Roberts had linked the “alleged crime” and the “culture.” Rather than reconsider her biases, once the “alleged crime” collapsed, she simply “revised” her argument.
The main attraction for my two was the Grand Cascade, not because it's a stunning feature but because there where lots of toy diggers provided for small people to collect water in and get very wet!
And I have confirmed yet another thing about myself... I don't live with chaos easily. My old pattern is to get stuck in to resolve it. I can't do that any more. I am learning to live with the tension, but not doing it easily either.
Don’t say anything and please just disappear now
Father: "First thing: Your mother and I are moving. We discussed this last month at Sunday dinner and would have liked to tell you then, but you didn't show, or call."
The clear-coat is less reflective in real life than it looks here.
I meet my factor at the airport and he gets me to my hotel with no problems. By the way, I have to send out electronic Kudos to Dipankar, my factor, Swissotel Kolkata and it's staff. These guys made the stay as easy and painless as possible. Are you getting that painless was becoming the goal of this trip?
But I think storytelling intrigued me starting with watching Bugs Bunny cartoons when I was a kid growing up in the 1960’s. I loved all the Looney Tunes, but Bugs, in particular, blew me away. He was funny and irreverent, but he also had this amazing ability to control events as they were happening. You know, if the hunter has his shotgun aimed down your rabbit hole…well, then you just pull on it, and stretch it, then send it out a new rabbit hole and aim it back at his butt.
These benchmarks amount to a near doubling, tripling and quintupling of the respective categories of cadets recruited last year. Figures show that, under less ambitious employment-equity goals then, the RCMP graduated classes that were 17 per cent women, 7 per cent visible minorities and 2 per cent aboriginal.
As you might expect, I found the video art most exciting. There was a fair amount, and I liked a lot of it; but I expect to include more discussion of the video art in a forthcoming post on the exhibition at The Pearl.
As might be predicted, the two autistic groups in Roberts et al. (in press) differed significantly on SRS T-scores; that is, they differed on autism "severity." One group scored on average 70.89, falling into the "mild to moderate" range. The other scored 81.44, a full standard deviation higher, and crossed the threshold into "severe" autism.
And that’s no coincidence, since the Catholic Church was personally founded by Jesus Christ, who is God, and who proved it, by rising from the dead.
The papers are from a paperpad from Basic Grey, 'Little Black Dress'. It's not Christmas papers, but I think it did work very well! I think it looks stylish and appropriate for Christmas. I do hope you agree! :)
So far i have only mentioned Glade Guard, however for 5 points more you can upgrade them to scouts. Scouts lose their S4 bows however become skirmishers with the Scout special rule. They can take command options as usual but cant have more than 10 elves per unit and unfortunately you can only take 1 unit of scouts per unit of glade guard.
Here are some online dating tips:
I believe that there are many people who are simply uncomfortable with Michelle Obama, because she seems to be as comfortable in her skin as Barack Obama is in his. If Michelle had some downtrodden story, the 'acceptable' story for Black folk, then possibly they could handle it. But, Mrs. Obama grew up in a loving, two-parent home. Her parents instilled in her and her brother the sense that they just had to apply themselves, and they could achieve and succeed, and that she did, first at Princeton, then Harvard Law.
When space-watching satellites orbit the Earth, they tumble over and over – not at random, but on carefully planned paths that allow them to survey the sky, while still absorbing power through their solar panels.
Supercat - Ghetto Red Hot
We’ll have plenty of answers, and we promise you won’t like any of them!
It looks as though Catwoman and Batman might just be teaming up to help Gotham, although being Catwoman I am expecting a betrayal in there somewhere but Anne Hathaway, surely, must have put fans minds at ease now as she looks great in the costume and we see her in a couple of quick action shots in the trailer. She wasn’t the fans first choice, perhaps, for Selina Kyle but she looks as though she will do a good job.
The smell of the earth is good.
I recently read a Life + Times of Scott post about Frank Ocean and loved two things, i) redefiniing the term ‘discovering music’ and ii) defending the illustrious love song a.k.a. “sappy singing”.
Usually I look at the location and figure it has been posted too long to still be there or is too far from my house. Often the poster doesn't want to be bothered and won't respond to emails asking if it is still there.
Trolls make extremely cool looking Druids. Yes, that is my reason for having a Troll Druid, I am not afraid to admit it. Atabey is now high enough to show up on the Armory and so she has gone back to being my Horde bank toon.
While in high school, I began researching my ancestry and found that I have deep Scottish roots in Northern Scotland. I acquired a beginner set of pipes and taught myself how to play the great highland bagpipes, “the great war pipes of the north.” I eventually purchased a professional set of pipes and have not been quiet since.
R - Look, we don't have time for this now, Howard. We have to hurry up and concentrate on publishing our comic.
“No problems” He chuckled as he told me.
One common element in all my novels is cats. In my first novel, Objects etc, a cat falls out a window and dies, and another cat is seen sleeping in a shop window. In The Music Lesson, my second novel, there are a multitude of cats thronging the Irish cottage of a significant character. In my third novel, The Little Women, there is one cat named Tiggy Winkle and another named Miss Demeanor. In Triangle, there is a cat, Joe Green, short for Giuseppe Verdi (nobody got that, I mean nobody), who almost falls off a high ledge to his death, but then he doesn't. In True Confections, there is a cat who dies horribly as the consequence of a fire. (Fire is a topic for another day.)
Despite all the advancements in technologies, we have become a society of desensitized, lethargic human beings dehumanized so that transhumanism can be ushered. Some of us are in a hypnotic state that we get hit by cars and fall in to ditches because we a so glued to our smartphones. With the destructive education system, we are seeing a lack of critical thinking skills and a dependency on calculators and spell-check–eliminating a developing brain to progress. I must admit that I am a victim to the destructive of the human mind, but need end it.
Not quite ready to post weight, or even if I do, but will get some pictures to start over with again. At least I still look better than I did originally.
Meanwhile.On the Internet.
For me at least, the sight of the word 'organic' implies freshness, authenticity, a distinct absence of extraneous chemicals and processes, and a distinct presence of overriding moral and ethical ideals.
A recent Reuters article titled “Outgunned Syria rebels make shift to bombs,” includes admissions from the rebels themselves that they are behind the spat of bombings ravaging Syria – bombs the Western press and opposition leaders had previously tried to blame on “false flag” attacks carried out by the Syrian government to undermine the rebels’ legitimacy.The Reuters article concedes that while the FSA officially is “upholding” the UN truce, its fighters have outright rejected it and are indeed openly in violation of the ceasefire.
*Spirituality
Accessories: Stampin' Up: Sizzix Big Shot machine, Norther Flurry embossing folder, basic brads, Buckaroo Blue stitched ribbon, dimensionals; Ornate border punch, snowflake die, nested oval die, snow glitter (MS), Copic markers
I finished painting the figures just a couple of hours before the game. That´s why some of them have unfinished bases. Besides that we used the wonderful Gamling on horseback figure to play Éomer, a figure I still don´t have. These guys will be in their galleries once I complete the bases and take good pictures.
Good night to all. Thanks again for your prayers and support.
Then adhere your Real Red polka dot piece right over the punched handle, as shown above.
1254 **D-IX/10/1996. “Professional Ethics and the Bible.” The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item 1999(16), above, pp. 415-20.) See Item C-1996(5), above, pp. 308-12.
6:00 – Hotel Jalcity, Haneda
I made it to the post office yesterday and posted the last 3 packages that needed to go. I posted a mini that I made for A Lil Scrap Of Heaven. It is a spring mini and made for Jamie (lovelymomn3). I followed a tutorial from Youtube made by charliejones2686. Hers was a Christmas mini but I just changed the theme and made it flowery.
Carrie: "How could you?! Get thee behind me, take out containers! I'm going to my old apartment to write."
2010.08.25 Pakistan Bajaur 1 0 Islamic militants shoot a tax collector to death on his way home.
I have been washing my car by hand instead of running it through the car wash. I'm doing this for two reasons: 1. I won't charge myself any money to clean the car. 2.I've got a brand new car and car wash brushes can scratch the finish on cars.
Obama's comment in the debate - "You're likeable enough, Hillary" - just irritated me further. Cripes! Like you need to be outraging the pissy women right now, Barack! Maybe he's NOT experienced enough to be president.
Sneakers: Converse
“When the moon rise this evening, you turn round in your bed,
Our buttocks have known many earths
And say for you that the sun don't shine?
I’m joking, but seriously, any views are good, so thank you if you do regularly have a nosy around the place!
The smart girl, for her part, quickly goes to grandma to cover her lie. She tells her that Tae Yong had gotten an apartment for Park Ha and that her jealousy had driven her into buying her the ticket and pinning it on Grandma. Granny -who’s got some irrational hate for Park Ha – doesn’t think Se Na has done anything wrong and agrees to support her.
It's Lulu the Lady bug!
Without giving anything away to those who haven't read Mockingjay (the last novel in the Hunger Games trilogy) or Sapphique (the sequel to Incarceron), the two authors took very different approaches to ending their series.
Even primary kiddos benefit from writing via the computer. Of course, one major benefit is that you are putting them on the road to gain the skills they will need for the projected needs of the workplace. Way back in 1988, Pat Sullivan identified four benefits computerized composing brings to traditional paper/pencil writing:
60% chili
The lineup was the same that faced Everton ten days before, when they produced what was possibly Arsenal’s best defensive performance this season. In this away formation, Aaron Ramsey starts on the left and tends to float infield. The rationale being that he should make the team a little more robust, offering better ball retention, recovery and physical endurance.
For anyone who’s not familiar with falafel, they’re immensely tasty chickpea croquettes that are normally served shoved into a pita with some sauce or salad. There are a number of pre-made falafel kits out there, and I may have actually used one once – the memory is fuzzy. These are a bit more work than just shaking out a mix and adding oil, but I really hope they’re worth it!
6AM -10AM Go to the KGSR in the Morning at the Four Seasons. Eat breakfast tacos. See Djs chat it up. Maybe Lyle Lovett will join in again this year.
This particular project adds a nice addition to those treats that you plan to make for family, friends and co-workers. Instead of placing your cookies, etc. on a plastic or paper plate wrapped in cellophane and tied with ribbon why not make a lovely or festive plate to place your treats on. A plate that you give as a gift with your holiday treats!
The answer to this titled question is also one of the Ten Ways to Safeguard your Child from Sexual Abuse, which is a series or teaching that I take with me to campuses, churches, ministry groups and collectives around the world to engage in prevention and awareness.
A lot of the Krafty Girls are cardmakers and we have found these to be such a quick and easy way to add a sentiment to our creations but they are also perfect for your Smashbook pages and your scrapbook pages, not to mention your altered items!! I can’t wait to see them used everywhere!!!
I learned to work with It instead of fighting. When I needed an idea, I would appeal to the Daemon - “Give me something to work on!” When I was stuck in a story and didn't know how to proceed, I would run through what I had written in my mind, and outline where I was hoping the story might go, as if briefing the Daemon. Then I would say, 'Over to you. Sort something out and get back to me.'
After our meal we walked down the Chine at dusk with it lit up. Its a pretty Victorian style attraction. We'd given J & G a lift to Shanklin & they'd been in the arcade all evening then we met for icecream & went home.
From training in trauma therapy, I have become more aware of the importance of a "Safe Place" for any who become resilient in this world. The main therapeutic intervention that I use with combat veterans with Post Traumatic Stress Disorder is Eye Movement Desensitization & Reprocessing therapy (EMDR) has taught me the importance of a establishing a "Safe Place." EMDR training has helped me understand the therapeutic aspect of tango better. As a therapist, EMDR has been the single most inspiring therapeutic approach I have ever learned because of the rapid results of change.
Necklace : Kohls
Port Brewing Company / Pizza Port 3rd Anniversary Double IPA
The London Harpsichord Ensemble ( John Francis, flute ~ John Tunnell, violin ~ Sarah Francis, oboe/cor anglais ~ Bernard Davis, viola ~ Roger Birnstingl, bassoon ~ Norman Jones, 'cello ~ Millicent Silver, harpsichord ) directed by John Francis
I think she’s trying to shift the responsibility on to somebody else. Now it’s somebody else’s fault. Well, no, you said it. And I just what like she says, ‘You need to go out and do the right thing.’” “And she needs to own it and claim it. She said it.”
Yoochun hug me. I flinched. “Mianhae… I can’t let you die, Su… I love you to much… Mianhae for my selfishness…”
She shook her head, unable to speak through her tears that wouldn’t stop. The man sat next to her on the riverbank and patted her on the back. “You cry yourself out, then. I hear that helps.” With this, she buried her face into his shirt and did just as he suggested. It wasn’t ladylike or polite or anything that her mother would have approved of, sniffling into the chest of this man she didn’t know. But, he felt warm and safe… and her mother wasn’t here.
NAMA almost never comments on individual sales – confidentiality under the NAMA Act, donchaknow – but there is an attempt on here to track NAMA’s sales through media and other sources.Remember that NAMA is selling the equivalent of 30 of the above properties each month every month as it nears its December 2013 deadline by which it has indicated to the Irish bailout troika it will dispose of 25% of its assets.
Welcome to Under the Cover of Prayer. We endeavour through this blog to talk about prayer. We have regular Contributors and occasional guest bloggers.
Playing, eating, singing, learning, praising; in vivid harmony.
He uttered His voice, the earth melted.
How do you respond to the light of the glorious gospel of Christ? Today we are looking at Acts 22:6. We are seeing what happened to Saul of Tarsus when the Light of Jesus Christ shown upon him.
Blossoms may be left on the stems and hung in small bunches upside-down in a very warm room. Dried flowers should be stored separately, and dry stems cut into small segments before storage in an airtight, dark glass container, clearly labeled to indicate the contents and the date and place of harvest.
I started out writing about Squash and Stretch as it applies to drawing and then I realized that I first had to describe what Squash and Stretch means in terms of animation. Of course, it's been covered in a bunch of animation books (and covered well), so most people get all this already, but then again I realized that people use the term "Squash and Stretch" to describe a few different (but similar) concepts.
In a large saute pain, over medium heat, cook the bacon until crisp. Remove the bacon and place on paper towels. Add the beans to the bacon drippings and cook over medium heat for 2-3 minutes. Add the blue cheese and toss just until is starts to melt. Break the cooked bacon into bite-sized pieces and add to the pan. Finish by stirring in the toasted chopped pecans. Season with freshly ground black pepper and just a pinch of salt. serve immediately.
"This is a very small, simple example of how we can simply stop a problem that would cripple one of your airports," Sela said.
The first beer into my glass was fromWye Valley. My knowledge of this Herefordshire brewery is limited to their Dorothy Goodbody's Wholesome Stout which I've always found to be most agreeable on the few ocassions that I've had it. So, I was quite looking forward to trying Wye Not, a 4.5% bottle conditioned golden ale made with pale malt as well as Target and Celeia hops.
I thought I had escaped from a lot of things.
FG=1.0??@??F Doh! Didn't take a final gravity reading.
We understand that you recently moved house, and now that you're all settled in, you want to renew your long-neglected subscription to OPE zine. I wish it were that simple.
Granite leaves for camp on Friday. I'm taking a vacation day off of work so that I can get the boy ready and Jen can come get him and bring him the 45ish minutes west to her place. He will be there for about a month, assuming there are no unforeseen circumstances. She plans to do some trail riding and lots of working. I hope he is ready to get his pony-boy butt kicked. I'm going to miss his sweet face!
In a small bowl, whisk together Honey Apple Butter, Dijon mustard, olive oil, ½ tsp. salt, ¼ tsp. chili powder, and ¼ tsp. black pepper.
I know people who have completely embraced your message, the next day go out and drink and listen to your message the next day to make themselves feel better. I’ve heard stories of families being torn apart like mine, and the fruit of this message isn’t adding up to something good.
We don’t believe that an arrogant, all-controlling government sitting in London passing endless laws and regulations actually makes things better. In fact, on many occasions it makes things worse.
Other Locations & Subsidiaries 15
I think it's great for little blogs, to share the personal side (like me). I usually do not like chain letters or anything like that and don't participate, but again thought it would be a good opportunity to share a bit more about me :) I dunno, but for big blogs it might not fit in well, and some might consider it spam. That is my opinion...
I wish I... had started writing years ago. It's so fulfilling.
tippets (boa), pelerines (A broad collar-like cape which covers the shoulders.) & muffs – warming aids, but also fashionable
1 cup (200 g) sugar
Speaking of which, North London’s answer to Larry David could potentially have saved himself when the bill arrived – but of course he didn’t.
I will share a few more pictures Monday. Have a great weekend!
The People Vs. Larry Flynt (Scott Alexander & Larry Karaszewski)
The downsides of the system? It won’t be cheap to convert an existing network to run the hyper-speed algorithm, and also, the scheme is only as good as the threat sensors detecting the inbound malicious payload.
The second is that it is far more likely to awaken when there are people about. Which is why, to get into the cave, where a person that no two people are guaranteed to think looks the same lays, one no longer has to hike. An elevator exists, under permanent and careful guard, letting in those who are no threat and wish to see it, in the hopes that one of them will cause it to stir, and deliver another message.
Your list brought tears to my eyes. You and I truly bonded after about 10 months. I’m so grateful to have you in my life. You possess equal parts humor, sweetness, kindness, and energy. My list would occupy pages and pages; I’ll continue to tell you and show you how full my heart feels every day. Happy Valentines Day my boy, I love you, too!
I pray that this consultation process is actually meaningful and not just a rubber stamping exercise. Cynic? Moi?
Caramel. Dark Chocolate. Nutella. All combined in one over-the-top fudge-y, gooey confection. Do I really need to write more? Well since I know you’re no longer paying attention I’ll just ramble about how I’m actually not a huge nutella fan but was trying to use some up. The nutella flavor in these brownies is actually very slight, not over-powering at all. And, if you’ve never made home made caramel, you need to. Start here, it’s super easy, you’ll be changed, you will never buy store bought caramel again. ever.
Some sad 2-Tone related news. The legendary Coventry ska DJ Steve ’Cardboard’ Eaton has passed away after a long illness. Eaton was best known as the rude boy on the cover of the The Selecter's first album 'Too Much Pressure' and the image of him hiding his head in his arms with his pork pie hat on the ground near him became as popular a symbol of 2-Tone as the well known Walt Jabsco logo.
and never forget the good
with Whimsical Wednesday, They wanted a project that inspired Royal Wedding. I will be out of my women cave for about a week, so I won't be peeking in on you. Thanks for stopping by.
PS Next time you have a Sunday Chicken Roast don’t forget to snap the lucky bone (and make a wish).
Awkward moment of my life....
8 themselves
Walked a further 1/4 mile w/o weights
